 
  
 CONSTITUTION & BYLAWS 
 

OF THE

MENOMINEE INDIAN TRIBE

OF WISCONSIN

TABLE OF CONTENTS

 
 PREAMBLE. . ............. .................... ...............

ARTICLE I - JURISDICTION...............................   

ARTICLE II - TRIBAL MEMBERSHIP.... .

Section 1.  Requirements. .......................

Section 2.  Ineligibility For Membership or 

Automatic Forfeiture of Membership....

Section 3.  Enrollment Committee............... ....

Section 4.  Appeal From Denial of 

Membership Application................

Section 5.  Removal From Membership Roll 

By Tribal Legislature..................

Section 6.  Voluntary Relinquishment of Membership.

Section 7.  Enforcement...... .............. .......

ARTICLE III - POWERS OF THE TRIBAL GOVERNMENT. ........... .

Section 1.  Powers of the Tribal Legislature......

Section 2.  Powers of the Tribal Judiciary........

Section 3.  Separation of Powers............. .

ARTICLE IV - THE TRIBAL LEGISLATURE. ............... .

Section 1.  Composition, Terms of 

Office, and Classes. ...................

Section 2.  Initial Division of Tribal 

Legislature Into Classes..............

Section 3.  Election of Tribal Legislators........

Section 4.  Requirements For Candidates For 

Election To The Tribal Legislature 
And For Tribal Legislators. ..

Section 5.  Consecutive and Simultaneous 

Terms of Office............ ..... .

.1

.1

.1

.1

.2

.2

.2

.3

.3

.3

.3

.3

.4

.4

.4

.4

.5

.5

. 6

. .7
 
 

 
 
 Section 6.  Community Committees of The 
Tribal Legislature. ...... .  . .

Section 7.  Administration of Tribal Government.

Section 8 . Powers and Duties. ...............   . . .

ARTICLE V - THE TRIBAL JUDICIARY................ .

Section 1.  Structure........ .

Section 2.  Appointment and Term of Office. .....

Section 3.  Compensation. ................. .

Section 4.  Qualifications and Disqualifications

Section 5.  Removal From Office by Tribal 

Legislature and Automatic Vacancies.

Section 6.  Rules of Tribal Courts.... .

Section 7.  Records and Court Clerk........ .

Section 8.  Appropriations ..........    .

Section 9.  Enforcement.............. .

ARTICLE VI - TRIBAL ELECTIONS ........... ..............

Section 1.  Voter Requirements. ................   .

Section 2.  Voting. ....... ........... .

Section 3.  Action By The Tribe: 

Approval - Disapproval. 
Consent - Rejection........... .

Section 4.  Regular and Special Elections.......

Section 5.  Tribal Election Commission....... .

Section 6.  Elections Which Result in Ties......

Section 7.  Disputed Elections..................

Section 8.  Duty To Enforce This Article........

.7

.7

.7

.7

.7

.8

.8

.8

.9

.9

.9

.9

10

10

10

10

.10

.10

.10

.11

.11

.12
 
 

ARTICLE VII - REMOVAL OF ELECTED OFFICIALS FROM OFFICE 

AUTOMATIC VACANCY AND THE FILLING OF 
 
 VANCANCIES....... ..................... .  . .

. . .12 

Section 1.  Recall........ .............................

12-14

Section 2.  Expulsion and Suspension of 

Tribal Legislators............. ...... .

. . .15

Section 3.  Automatic Vacancies........................

. . .15

Section 4.  The Filling of Vacancies In Office.... ....

15-16

Section 5.  Tribal Judiciary Excluded..................

. . .16

ARTICLE VIII - INITIATIVE AND REFERENDUM........ ...... . ......

.... 17

Section 1.  General Authority. ............... .

Section 2.  Procedure............ .

Section 3.  Referendum Petitions: Suspension of 

Effect of Ordinance in Question.  .

Section 4.  Action on Petitions................ .

.... 17 

.17-18

....19

. . ..20

Section 5.  Results of Election............... . ........

....20

Section 6.  Re-enactments, Amendment or Repeal.... .

....21
 
 

ARTICLE IX - RIGHTS OF TRIBAL MEMBERS AND OTHER 

 
 PERSONS SUBJECT TO TRIBAL JURISDICTION,. ..  . . .

....21

Section 1.  Hunting, Fishing, Trapping, Gathering......

....21

Section 2.  Rights of Persons Subject To 

Tribal Jurisdiction. ...... ........... .

.21-23


ARTICLE X - LIMITED POWER OF TRIBAL LEGISLATURE TO TRANSFER 

OWNERSHIP OF, OR TO ENCUMBER, TRIBAL LAND 

OR INTERESTS THEREIN. .... ..... ...... ...... ......

. . ..23

Section 1.  Limited Power To Transfer Tribal Land 

Out of Tribal Ownership........ .

. . ..23 

Section 2.  Limited Power To Encumber Tribal Lands....

.23-24 

Section 3.  Limited Power To Develop Natural Resources

. ...24 

Section 4.  Principle of Construction.................

.... 24
 
 

ARTICLE XI - USE OF TRIBAL LAND BY TRIBAL MEMBERS 

 
 AND QUALIFIED NON-TRIBAL MEMBERS........ .

. . .24

Section 1.  Land Use and Natural Resources 

Conservation Plan............

24-25

Section 2.  Use of Tribal Land by Non-Tribal 

Members. .... ..... ......... ....... .

25-26

ARTICLE XII - SUCCESSOR BUSINESSES TO MEMOMINEE ENTERPRISES.

.. .26

Section 1.  Duty of the Tribal Legislature. ..........

, ...26

Section 2.  Successors to Menominee Enterprises... . ..

,26-31

ARTICLE XIII - TRIBAL BUSINESSES.........................   . .

. . . .32

Section 1.  Interrelationship Between Tribal 

Businesses And The Tribal Legislature. . . .

. . . .32

Section 2.  Duty to Enforce.................... .

. ...32

Section 3.  Forestry Business Exception.............

. . ..32
 
 

ARTICLE XIV - TRUST AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE MENOMINEE 

 
 INDIAN TRIBE AND THE UNITED STATES............

. . . .33

Section 1.  Trust Agreement............... ....... .

. . . .33 

Section 2.  Negotiating Principles. . .........

.33-34

Section 3.  Approval By Tribe Required. ..............

. . ..34
 
 

ARITCLE XV - TRIBAL GOVERNMENT CAREER AND MERIT 

 
 SYSTEM OF EMPLOYMENT....... ............. .....

. .. .34

Section 1.  Merit Principle.........

Section 2.  Duty to Enforce. . ............. .

ARTICLE XVI - FINANCIAL CONTROL.......... .

. .. .34

....34

. ...35

Section 1.  Budget and Appropriations..... ...... .

. . .35

Section 2.  Accounting System.......................

. . .35

Section 3.  Fiscal Year.... ........... .

.... 35

ARTICLE XVII - CONFLICT OF INTEREST...... ............   . .

Section 1.  Conflicting Personal Financial 

Interest Prohibited.   

Section 2.  Other Conflicts of interest..........

ARTICLE XVIII - SOVEREIGN IMMUNITY....... ....... .

Section 1.  General Prohibition..................

Section 2.  Suits Against The Tribe In Tribal 
 Courts By Persons Subject To 

Tribal Jurisdiction...... .

. . .35

. . .35

. . .35

. . .35

. . .35

. . .35

Section 3.  Suits Against The Tribe In The 

Courts Of The United States......... .

. . .36

ARTICLE XIX - AMENDMENTS TO CONSTITUTION AND BYLAWS....

. .. .36

ARTICLE XX - ADOPTION OF CONSTITUTION AND BYLAWS........

 ...36
 
 

BYLAWS

BYLAW I - OFFICERS AND COMMITTEES OF THE TRIBAL  

 
 LEGISLATURE; DUTY TO VOTE STOCK OF 
MENOMINEE ENTERPRISES, INC. .......... ........ .

Section 1.  Officers of the Tribal Legislature..

Section 2.  Committees of the Tribal Legialature

Section 3.  Duty to Vote Stock of Menominee 

Enterprises , Inc....   

BYLAW II - PROCEDURE OF THE TRIBAL LEGISLATURE. ........

Section 1.  Meetings of the Tribal Legislature..

. ...37

. . . .37

. . . .38

. . . .39

. ... 39 

.39-41 

Section 2.  Ordinances, Resolutions, and Motions

.41-44 

Section 3.  Tribal Records...... ...............

.44-45 

Section 4.  Posting Procedure...................

....45

BYLAW III - GENERAL COUNCIL..... ...................

Section 1.  Establishment of General Council; 
Response to Recommendations..... .

Section 2.  Annual General Council Meeting...

Section 3.  Special General Council Meeting..

Section 4.  Election of Enrollment Committee.

BYLAW IV - OATH OF OFFICE. 

..........

BYLAW V - DEFINITIONS. .......        . .

BYLAW VI - AMENDMENTS TO BYLAWS.....................

46

46

46

46

47

47

48

49
 
 

CONSTITUTION AND BYLAWS OF THE
MENOMINEE INDIAN TRIBE OF WISCONSIN

PREAMBLE

 
 We, the members of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin, being a sovereign 
nation, in order to organize for the common good, to govern ourselves under our 
own laws and customs, to maintain and foster our tribal culture, to protect our 
homeland and to conserve and develop its natural resources, and to insure our 
rights guaranteed by treaty with the Federal Government, do establish and adopt 
the following Articles and Bylaws of this Constitution and Bylaws for the 
government, protection, and common welfare of the Menominee Indian Tribe of 
Wisconsin and its members.
 
 

ARTICLE I - JURISDICTION

 
 The governmental powers of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin, a federally 
recognized sovereign Indian Tribe, shall consistent with applicable Federal law 
extend to all persons, and subjects, to all lands and other property including 
natural resources, and to all waters and air space, within the exterior boundaries 
of the Menominee Indian Reservation, including any land which may hereafter be 
added to the Reservation under any law of the United States. The governmental 
powers of the Menominee Indian Tribe shall, consistent with applicable Federal law, 
also extend outside the exterior boundaries of. the Reservation to any persons, 
subjects, or real property which are, or may hereafter be, included within the 
jurisdiction of the Tribe under any law of the United States or of the Tribe.

Section 1. Requirements.
 
 

ARTICLE II - TRIBAL MEMBERSHIP

 
 Membership in the Menominee Indian Tribe shall consist of the following persons:

(a)  Those persons of one-quarter (1/4) degree Menominee Indian blood whose names 
appear on the tribal roll compiled pursuant to subsection 4(c) of the Menominee 
Restoration Act (87 Stat. 771), and

(b)  Those persons who possess at least one-quarter (1/4) degree Menominee Indian 

blood, and who are descendants of persons enrolled on the tribal membership 
roll compiled pursuant to subsection 4(c) of the Menominee Restoration Act (87 
Stat. 771), and who are enrolled on the official tribal membership roll in 
accordance with procedures established by the Tribal Legislature by ordinance.

(c)  A person shall be removed from the tribal membership roll only in accordance 

with the procedures set forth in Section 5 of this Article.
 
 

 
 
 Section 2. Ineligibility For Membership or Automatic Forfeiture of Membership.

No person shall be eligible to be a member of the Menominee Indian Tribe if that 
person is enrolled in another Indian Tribe. Any member of the Menominee Indian 
Tribe who applies to be and is accepted as a member of another Indian Tribe shall 
thereby automatically forfeit membership in the Menominee Indian Tribe and all 
rights and benefits to which tribal members are entitled by virtue of their 
membership.

Section 3. Enrollment Committee.

(a)  An Enrollment Committee composed of five (5) eligible tribal voters shall be 

elected or appointed, beginning in 1992 and every three years thereafter, at 
the Annual General Council meeting in accordance with Bylaw III, Section 4, of 
this Constitution and Bylaws. The members of the Enrollment Committee shall 
be subject to the supervision of the Tribal Legislature. If the Enrollment 
Committee is appointed, the Tribal Legislature, by majority vote, shall have 
the power to terminate any such appointment for good cause, and to make a 
new appointment. If the Enrollment Committee is elected, the members of the 
committee shall be subject to the terms of Article VII of this Constitution, 
including the provisions of Section 2, which shall govern the manner in which 
the Tribal Legislature may expel or suspend a member of the Enrollment 
Committee from office. In the event of any vacancy, the Legislature, by 
majority vote, shall within sixty days appoint a replacement for the remainder 
of the term.

(b)  The Enrollment Committee shall have the authority and duty to maintain a 

current and accurate official tribal membership roll in accordance with the 
The Enrollment Committee shall report at least
provisions of this Article. 
four (4) times a year to the Tribal Legislature as to the current status of the 
roll.. The Committee shall have the authority to investigate suspected errors 
in the roll, and where it deems appropriate in view of evidence, shall 
recommend changes in the roll to the Tribal Legislature.

Section 4.  Appeal From Denial of Membership Application.

Any person whose application for membership in the Menominee Indian Tribe is 
denied shall have the right to appeal such adverse decision to the Tribal Judiciary, 
but only after exhausting all remedies available within the Tribal Legislature.

Section 5.  Removal From Membership Roll by Tribal Legislature.

If, upon the report and recommendations of the Enrollment Committee, the Tribal 
Legislature determines that any person lacks a required membership qualification, 
proceedings shall be Instituted against such person in Tribal Court to remove such 
person from the tribal membership roll. Only after a final decision is rendered in 
favor of the Tribal Legislature shall the affected person's name be removed from the 
tribal membership roll.

Section 6.  Voluntary Relinquishment of Membership.

Members of the Menominee Indian Tribe may relinquish membership in the Tribe in 
accordance with procedures established by the Tribal Legislature. However, any 
member of the Tribe who relinquishes membership voluntarily, or who forfeits 
membership by enrolling in another Indian Tribe, shall not again be eligible to 
enroll as a member of the Menominee Indian Tribe.

Section 7.  Enforcement.

The Tribal Legislature shall enforce this Article by ordinance, provided that, the 
Tribal Legislature shall have no power to establish substantive requirements for 
membership in addition to those established in Section 1 of this Article, nor to 
waive any of these requirements.
 
 

ARTICLE III - POWERS OF THE TRIBAL GOVERNMENT

 
 Section 1. Powers of the Tribal Legislature.

The Tribal Legislature, as established in Article IV of this Constitution, shall be 
vested with all executive and legislative powers of the Tribe including the power to 
make and to enforce laws, and including such powers as may in the future be 
restored or granted to the Tribe by any law of the United States, or other 
authority. The powers of the Tribal Legislature shall include those powers vested 
in the Tribe by Section 16 of the Indian Reorganization Act (48 Stat. 987), namely, 
to employ legal counsel, the choice of counsel and fixing of fees to be subject to 
the approval of the Secretary of the Interior; to prevent the sale, disposition, 
lease or encumbrance of tribal lands, interest in lands, or other tribal assets 
without the consent of the Tribe; and to negotiate with the Federal, State and local 
governments. This Constitution and Bylaws and ordinances of the Tribal Legislature 
adopted pursuant to this Constitution shall be the supreme law of the Menominee 
Indian Tribe and all persons subject to its jurisdiction. However, the Tribal 
Legislature shall exercise its powers consistent with the limitations imposed by 
this Constitution and Bylaws.

Section 2. Powers of the Tribal Judiciary.

The Tribal Judiciary, as established in Article V of this Constitution, shall be 
vested with all judicial powers of the Tribe including the following powers: to 
resolve controversies between and among persons where such controversies arise 
under this Constitution and Bylaws, tribal ordinances, the Constitution and laws of 
the United States, or the Constitution and laws of any state or Indian Tribe; and 
to decide cases in which a person is accused by the Tribe of committing an offense 
against the laws of the Tribe. The powers granted to the Tribal Judiciary by this 
Section shall include such judicial powers as may in the future be restored or 
granted to the Tribe by any law of the United States, or other authority. Decisions 
of the Tribal Judiciary shall be binding upon all persons within the jurisdiction of 
the Tribe. The Supreme Court of the Tribe shall be the final and supreme 
interpreter of this Constitution and Bylaws, and all tribal ordinances. However, 
the Tribal Judiciary shall exercise its powers consistent with the limitations 
imposed by this Constitution and Bylaws.

Section 3. Separation of Powers.

The Tribal Legislature and the Tribal Judiciary shall be separate and equal branches 
of the Tribal Government. Neither branch shall exercise the powers of the other, 
nor shall either branch have authority over the other branch except as may be 
granted by this Constitution and Bylaws.
 
 

ARTICLE IV - THE TRIBAL LEGISLATURE

 
 Section 1. Composition, Terms of Office, and Classes.

(a)  The Tribal Legislature of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin shall be 

composed of nine (9) members of the Tribe, elected at large by the eligible 
voters of the Tribe. Seven (7) of the offices . shall be filled by tribal 
members who are residents on the Reservation. There shall be no residency 
requirement for the remaining two (2) offices.

(b)  Tribal Legislators shall serve terms of office of three (3) years. The nine (9) 

Tribal Legislators shall be divided into three (3) classes for the purpose of 
staggering terms of office. Each class shall be composed of three (3) 
Legislators. The terms of office of Tribal Legislators shall be staggered as 
follows:

(1)  The term of office of the first class of Legislators shall expire upon 

assumption of office by the newly elected Legislators three (3) years 
following the first election of Legislators held pursuant to Section 5(c)
 of the Menominee Restoration Act (87 Stat. 772), and every third year 

thereafter.

(2)  The term of office of the second class of Legislators shall expire upon 

assumption of office by the newly elected Legislators two (2) years 
following the first election of Legislators held pursuant to Section 5(c) 
of the Menominee Restoration Act (87 Stat. 772), and every third year 
thereafter.

(3)  The term of office of the third class of Legislators shall expire upon 

assumption of office by the newly elected Legislators one (1) year 
following the first election of Legislators held pursuant to Section 5(c) 
of the Menominee Restoration Act (87 Stat. 772), and every third year 
thereafter.

Section 2. Initial Division of Tribal Legislature Into Classes.

The Tribal Legislators elected at the first election of the Tribal Legislature, held 
pursuant to Section 5(c) of the Menominee Restoration Act (87 Stat. 770) shall be 
initially divided into the three (3) classes as follows:

The three candidates receiving the highest number of votes shall be the first 
class; the three candidates receiving the highest number of votes after the first 
class shall be the second class; and the three candidates receiving the highest 
number of votes after the second class shall be the third class, provided that, if 
more than two (2) non-resident candidates are among the nine candidates receiving 
the highest number of votes, only the two non-resident candidates receiving the 
highest number of votes of the non-resident candidates shall take office; the other 
seven (7) offices shall be filled with the seven (7) resident candidates receiving 
the highest number of votes of the resident candidates, in accordance with Section. 
1(a) of this Article.

Section 3. Election of Tribal Legislators.

(a)  Any tribal member who satisfies the requirements of Section 4 of this Article 

may become a candidate for the office of Tribal Legislator by filing a 
nominating petition which shall comply with requirements as established by the 
Tribal Legislature by ordinance, and by complying with such other procedural 
requirements as may be established by the Tribal Legislature by ordinance.

(b)  The Tribal Legislature shall by ordinance set the date on which elections to 

fill offices of the Tribal Legislature shall be held.

(c)  With candidates placed in order of number of votes received from the highest to 
the lowest, offices shall be filled beginning with the candidate who received 
the highest number of votes, and proceeding down the order, provided that, 
no more than two (2) offices of the Tribal Legislature shall be filled by 
non-resident tribal members, in accordance with Section 1(a) of this Article.

(d) 

If in any election to fill an office or offices, the number of candidates 
running exceeds three (3) per office, the Election Commission shall hold a 
primary election to select those candidates who shall run for office in the 
main election. The number of candidates to be selected in such primary 
election shall be determined by multiplying the number of offices to be 
filled by two (2).

Section 4.  Requirements for Candidates For Election To The Tribal 

Legislature and For Tribal Legislators.

(a)  To be eligible to be a candidate for election to the Tribal Legislature, a 

person must be a member of the Tribe, at least twenty-five years of age as of 
the date on which the election is held. No person shall be eligible to be a 
candidate for election to the Tribal Legislature who has been convicted of a 
major crime as defined in Bylaw V of this Constitution and Bylaws, unless the 
Tribal Judiciary, in accordance with such rules as it may establish, certifies 
that the person In question is rehabilitated. Such certificate of 
rehabilitation shall be based upon the person's record of behavior since the 
conviction.

(b) 

In any election in which it is necessary to fill all open offices with residents 
on the Reservation in order that seven (7) offices will be filled by residents 
on the Reservation, in accordance with Section 1(a) of this Article, only 
persons who are residents on the Reservations shall be eligible to be 
candidates for election to the Tribal Legislature.

(c)  Tribal Legislators while holding office shall be members of the Menominee Indian 
Tribe. Any Tribal Legislator elected while a resident on the Reservation shall 
maintain residence on the Reservation while holding office. If any Tribal 
Legislator ceases to be a member of the. Tribe, or if any Tribal Legislator 
elected while a resident on the Reservation ceases to maintain residence on the 
Reservation, the affected Legislator shall be expelled in accordance with 
Section 2 of Article VII of this Constitution. In addition, if any Tribal 
Legislator is convicted while holding office of a major crime as defined in 
Bylaw V of this Constitution and Bylaws, the office of the affected Legislator 
shall be deemed vacant in accordance with Section 3 of Article VII of this 
Constitution.

Section 5.  Consecutive and Simultaneous Terms of Office.

No person shall be eligible to be elected to more than three (3) consecutive terms 
of office of Tribal Legislator, nor shall any person serve more than one term of 
office at the same time.

Section 6. Community Committees of the Tribal Legislature.

The Tribal Legislature shall establish standing committees each of which shall be 
composed of three Legislators. Each such standing committee shall be assigned to a 
community on the Reservation as defined by the Tribal Legislature. It shall be the 
duty of each standing committee to maintain constant communication with the 
community to which it is assigned for the purpose of determining the needs and 
concerns of that community. It also shall be the duty of each community committee 
to hold quarterly community meetings and to inform the Tribal Legislature of any 
needs or concerns of that community.

Section 7. Administration of Tribal Government.

The Tribal Legislature shall by ordinance establish a plan for the administration 
for the government of the Tribe; provided that, this Section shall not be 
construed to include the administration of the Tribal Judiciary.

Section 8. Powers and Duties.

The powers and duties of the officers of the Tribal Legislature are set forth in the 
Bylaws of this Constitution.

Section 1.  Structure.
 
 

ARTICLE V - THE TRIBAL JUDICIARY

 
 (a)  The Tribal Judiciary shall be composed of one Supreme Court and of such lower 
courts as are designated to be established in. this Article, and as may be 
established by ordinance by the Tribal Legislature as it deems appropriate to 
meet the needs of the Tribe.

(b)  The Supreme Court of the Tribe shall have jurisdiction over appeals from all 

final decisions of the lower courts of the Tribe. The Supreme Court shall be 
composed of three (3) Judges. Supreme Court Judges may, if necessary and if 
so instructed by the Tribal Legislature, also serve as Judges of the lower 
courts; however, in such a situation, the Supreme Court Judge shall be 
disqualified from participating in a review of any decision entered by him or 
her while sitting as a lower court judge.

(c)  The Tribal Legislature shall, promptly after the adoption of this Constitution 

and Bylaws, determine and establish the number of lower trial courts necessary 
to serve the judicial needs of the Tribe. Such trial courts shall have general 
and original jurisdiction over all cases and controversies of a civil dr 
criminal nature. Each trial court shall be presided over by one Judge.

(d) 

(e) 

If the Tribal Legislature establishes special kinds of lower courts with 
original jurisdiction over specified subject areas, the Tribal Legislature 
shall specify whether such jurisdiction is exclusive or concurrent with the 
jurisdiction of the trial courts established in subsection (c) of this Section.

If the Tribal Legislature establishes an intermediate level of courts to hear 
appeals from all final decisions of the lower courts, the Supreme Court shall 
hear appeals only from decisions of the intermediate courts of appeals. In 
addition, the Tribal Legislature may authorize the Supreme Court to exercise 
its discretion in all or designated kinds of cases in deciding whether to hear 
an appeal in any particular case.

Section 2.  Appointment and Term of Office.

(a)  The Tribal Legislature shall by ordinance, establish a procedure for selection 

of judges.

(b)  Tribal Judges shall be appointed by six (6) or more votes of the Tribal 

Legislature.

(c)  Lower Court Judges shall be appointed to a term of three (3) years.

(d)  Supreme Court Judges shall be appointed to a term of four (4) years.

Section 3.  Compensation.

Tribal Judges shall receive for their services a reasonable compensation, as fixed 
from time .to time by the Tribal Legislature. The Tribal Legislature shall not. 
diminish the compensation of a Tribal Judge during his or her term of office.

Section 4.  Qualifications and Disqualifications.

(a)  To hold the office of Tribal Judge, a person shall be a member of the Tribe, a 

resident on the Reservation during his/her term of office, at least thirty- 
five (35) years of age, having a minimum education of a high school graduate 
or a General Education Diploma (G.E.D.), and shall demonstrate fitness and 
competency for the office by taking appropriate examinations, relevant to 
demonstrate competence for the office of Tribal Judge.

(b)  No person shall be eligible to be appointed to the office of Tribal Judge who 

has been convicted of a major crime as defined in Bylaw V of this Constitution 
and Bylaws, unless the Tribal Judiciary, in accordance with such rules as it 
may establish, certifies that the person in question is rehabilitated. Such 
certificate of rehabilitation shall be based upon the person’s record of 
behavior since the conviction. No Tribal Judge who is convicted of a major 
crime as defined in Bylaw V of this Constitution and Bylaws shall continue to 
hold office.

Section 5.  Removal From Office By Tribal Legislature and Automatic

Vacancies.

(a)  Tribal Judges may be removed from office by the Tribal Legislature by the 

Legislature by the affirmative vote of at least seven-ninths (7/9) of the 
entire Legislature, but only upon grounds of Inability to carry out the duties 
of the office; failure to carry out the duties of the office; or lack of a 
requisite qualification for serving as a Tribal Judge. The Tribal Legislature 
shall notify the Tribal Judge in question and the Supreme Court, in writing, 
not less than twenty (20) days prior to the meeting at which the Judge's 
removal is to be considered and voted upon. The notice shall specify the 
charge or charges and shall state the facts in support thereof. The Tribal 
Judge in question shall have full opportunity at the meeting at which his or 
her removal is to be considered and decided upon to examine all witnesses 
against him or her and to have his or her own witnesses to testify in his or 
her behalf. The decision of the Tribal Legislature shall be final and not 
appealable to the Tribal Judiciary. The Supreme Court, may upon receipt of 
notice of the removal charges, suspend the Tribal Judge in question from office 
with or without compensation pending final action of the Tribal Legislature at 
the meeting.

(b)  The office of any Tribal Judge who is convicted of a major crime as defined in 

Bylaw V of this Constitution and Bylaws, who dies, or who resigns shall be 
deemed to be automatically vacant. Resignation from office shall be written 
and shall be deemed to be effective as of the date tendered unless otherwise 
designated in the resignation document.

Section 6. Rules of Tribal Courts.

The Supreme Court shall by order establish written rules of procedure and ethics 
for all Tribal Courts. Such rules may from time to time be amended as deemed 
necessary or appropriate by the Supreme Court. The Supreme Court shall consult 
with the Judges of the lower courts in establishing rules of procedure for the lower 
courts.

Section 7.  Records and Court Clerk.

The Supreme Court shall implement the system of keeping records of proceedings of 
the Tribal Judiciary in accordance with Section 3(b) of Bylaw II of this 
Constitution and Bylaws. The Supreme Court shall appoint a court clerk which shall 
be responsible for keeping the records of the Judiciary and generally for 
administering the daily business of the Judiciary.

Section 8.  Appropriations.

The Tribal Legislature shall give priority for appropriations of such funds as may 
be necessary to enable the Tribal Judiciary to carry out the provisions of this 
Article.

Section 9.  Enforcement.

In implementing this Article, the Tribal Legislature shall act by ordinance.
 
 

ARTICLE VI - TRIBAL ELECTIONS

 
 Section 1. Voter Requirements.

Any member of the Menominee Indian Tribe who is eighteen (18) years of age or 
older on the date of the tribal election in question shall be eligible to vote in 
tribal elections.

Section 2. Voting.

Except as may be otherwise specified in tills Constitution, voting in tribal 
elections shall be by secret ballot cast at polls established on the Reservation. 
Absentee voting and write-in voting shall be permitted in accordance with such 
procedures as shall be established by the Tribal Legislature. Proxy voting and 
cumulative voting shall not be permitted in tribal elections.

Section 3. Action By The Tribe: Approval - Disapproval, Consent - 

Rejection.

Except as may be otherwise specified in this Constitution, the vote of a majority of 
the eligible tribal voters voting in a tribal election shall constitute action by 
the Tribe, including tribal approval or disapproval, and tribal consent or rejection.

Section 4. Regular and Special Elections.

The Tribal Legislature shall provide for the holding of regular elections, Including 
establishing dates, times and places for holding such elections. The Tribal 
Legislature shall also provide for the holding of special elections by establishing 
the procedure by which such elections may be called and held with adequate notice 
provided to Tribal voters.

Section 5. Tribal Election Commission.

(a)  A Tribal Election Commission composed of three (3) eligible voters of the 

Menominee Indian Tribe shall be appointed and supervised by the Tribal 
Judiciary.

(b)  The Tribal Election Commission shall be responsible for enforcing tribal

election laws subject to the supervision of the Tribal Judiciary. The duties 
of the Tribal Election Commission shall include but not be limited to the 
following:

(1)  Maintain a current list of eligible voters of the Menominee Indian Tribe.

(2)  Conduct tribal elections; and

(3)  Certify the results of tribal elections.

(c)  The Tribal Election Commission shall perform such other duties as may be 

delegated to the Commission by this Constitution, by ordinance, or by the 
Tribal Judiciary.

(d)  The Tribal Election Commission may be authorized to Issue such rules as may 

be necessary to carry out tribal election ordinances.

Section 6.  Elections Which Result In Ties.

In any tribal election which results in a tie between two or more candidates, the 
tie shall be broken by some means of chance agreed upon by the candidates 
involved. In any tribal election which results in a tie as to the approval or 
disapproval of an issue, the issue shall be determined defeated.

Section 7.  Disputed Elections.

Any eligible voter or group of eligible voters of the Menominee Indian Tribe may 
challenge the validity of the results of any tribal election on the ground that such 
election was conducted in violation of tills Constitution and Bylaws, or of tribal 
ordinance or of any provision of. the Indian Civil Rights Act (25 U.S.C. s.1301 
1302). Such challenge shall be commenced within ten (10) days after the Tribal 
Election Commission certifies the results of the election by a written complaint 
filed in a Trial Court of the Tribe. The complaint shall (1) specifically charge 
the person or persons alleged to have violated the law with having committed an 
offense against this Constitution and Bylaws, or tribal ordinance or a provision of 
the Indian Civil Rights Act (25 U.S.C. s.1301 and 1302), and (2) specify the 
constitutional provision or provisions, or the tribal ordinance or the provision of 
the Indian Civil Rights Act alleged to have been violated, and (3) state the facts 
alleged to have been violated, and (4) state the facts alleged to support such 
charge or charges. Upon filing of such complaint, the Trial Court shall promptly 
hold an initial hearing at which evidence is received from the complainant or 
complainants in support of the charges in the complaint. Any person or persons 
charged in the complaint shall have full opportunity to respond at the hearing to 
the charges and evidence offered in support of the complaint. At the conclusion of 
the initial hearing the Court may make a final decision in the case either 
dismissing the complaint or granting the relief sought; or the Court may order 
interim relief pending further investigation and hearings in the case. If the 
disputed election involves the filling of a tribal office, and the Court decides 
that further investigation and hearings are necessary, the Court shall, at the 
conclusion of the initial hearing, specifically grant or deny permission to fill the 
office pursuant to the election results pending further investigation and hearing 
and a final decision on the charges.

The Court may at the conclusion of the initial hearing and in the interests of 
justice, appoint an unbiased commission to investigate the charges further and to 
present any evidence gathered to the Court at a hearing at which both sides in the 
case have opportunity to be heard, to present evidence and to question the 
commission. At the conclusion of all hearings, the Court shall decide whether the 
charges have been proven. If the Court determines one or more of the charges 
have been proven, the Court shall provide such relief as is appropriate, which may 
include invalidating the tribal election in question and ordering a new election to 
be held.

Section 8. Duty To Enforce This Article.

(a)  The Tribal Legislature shall enforce Sections 1 through 4 of this Article by 

ordinance, provided that, the Tribal Legislature shall not establish 
substantive requirements for voting eligibility in addition to those established 
in Section 1 of this Article.

(b)  The Supreme Court of the Tribe shall implement Sections 5 through 7 of this 

Article by appropriate Court Order.
 
 

ARTICLE VII - REMOVAL OF ELECTED OFFICIALS FROM OFFICE, 
 
 AUTOMATIC VACANCY, AND THE FILLING OF VACANCIES.

Section 1. Recall.

(a)  Any elected official of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin may be recalled 

from office at any time after holding office for one (1) year, by the eligible 
voters of the Tribe in accordance With the procedure set forth in subsection
(b)  of this Section; provided that, recall shall not be a remedy against 
alleged action by a tribal official which may constitute a crime against the 
ordinances of the Tribe or the laws of the United States.

(b) The procedure by which an elected official may be recalled shall be as follows:

(1) Petitioners' Committee. Any one hundred (100) eligible voters of the Tribe 
may commence recall proceedings by filing with the Tribal Election 
Commission an affidavit stating their names, and addresses, the names and 
addresses of three (3) representatives of the petitioners' committee, and 
the address to which all notices, regarding the petition are to be sent; 
and stating that they will constitute the petitioners' committee and be 
responsible for circulating the petition and filing it in proper form; and 
naming the tribal official sought to be recalled; and stating in not more 
than one hundred (100) words the specific reasons upon which it is 
alleged that the named tribal official should be recalled. If more than 
one official is sought to be recalled, there shall be separate affidavits 
of charges filed for each such official. The Tribal Election Commission 
shall promptly thereafter serve a copy of the affidavit of the 
petitioner's committee upon the named official in person or by registered 
mail. The named official shall have fifteen (15) days after receipt of 
service of the affidavit of charges to file an affidavit in defense with
 
 

 
 
 the Tribal Election Commission answering the charges made against him or 
her in not more than one hundred (100) words.

(2) 

Issuance of Petition Forms. The Tribal Election Commission shall within 
five (5) work days after the filing of the affidavit in defense by the 
named tribal official, prepare a recall petition form consisting of the 
affidavit of charges, the affidavit in defense, and spaces for signature 
and addresses. The Tribal Election Commission shall certify and issue to 
the petitioners' committee an appropriate number of such recall petition 
forms. If more than one tribal official is sought to be recalled, 
separate recall petition forms shall be prepared, certified and issued for 
each such official.

(3)  Circulation of Petitions. The recall petition may be circulated for 

signature for thirty (30) days following its issuance by the Tribal 
Election Commission. The petition must be signed by at least twenty-five 
percent (25%) of the total number of voters eligible to vote in the 
election in which the official sought to be recalled was elected. Each 
recall petition shall be the responsibility of one person who shall, upon 
filing the completed petition, attach his or her personal affidavit to the 
petition stating that he or she personally witnessed the signing of each 
signature and corresponding address contained in the petition, and that he 
or she believes each signature and corresponding address to be the name 
and address of the person who signed them, and that each person who 
signed the petition read or had explained to him or her the full text of 
the petition and the purpose of the petition. The recall petition with 
the requisite number of signatures shall be filed with the Tribal Election 
Commission. Within five (5) work days after the filing of the recall 
petition, the Tribal Election Commission shall certify whether the recall 
petition contains the requisite number of valid signatures, and is 
otherwise sufficient.

(4)  Certificate of Sufficiency.

(a) 

If the petition is certified insufficient because of a lack of the 
requisite number of signatures, the petitioners committee shall be 
promptly notified, and they shall have ten (10) days after receipt of 
notification to supplement the petition with additional signatures on 
certified recall petitions issued by the Tribal Election Commission, 
and to file such supplemental petition with the Commission. The 
Tribal Election Commission shall within two (2) work days after the 
filing of the supplemental petition certify as to the sufficiency of 
the recall petition as supplemented. If the petition is again 
certified insufficient, the petitioners' committee shall be notified 
and may appeal such decision to the Tribal Judiciary in accordance 
with the rules of the court procedure. Pending a final decision by 
the Tribal Judiciary, a new recall petition against the same official 
shall not be commenced for the same cause.

(b) 

If the recall petition is certified sufficient, the Tribal Election Com
mission shall, within ten (10) work days after it certifies the validity 
of the recall petition, set a date for a recall election to be held. Such 
recall election shall be held within thirty (30) days after the filing of 
the recall petition with the Commission and shall provide notice of such 
election date by posting notices at public places on the Reservation and 
in appropriate urban areas, and publishing a notice in at least one 
newspaper with a wide circulation among eligible tribal voters on the 
Reservation.

(5)  Recall Election.

(a)  The ballot for the recall election shall, for each official sought to be 

recalled, if more than one, state the grounds set forth in the recall 
petition for demanding such recall as well as the answer of the official 
sought to be recalled in his defense; and the ballot shall set forth the 
following question: Shall (name of the official sought to be recalled) be 
recalled from the office (title of office)? Following such question shall 
be two choices of words, "yes” or "no", on separate lines with the blank 
space to the right of each in which the voter shall indicate by marking a 
cross (x), his vote for or against recall.

(b)  The affirmative vote of sixty percent (60%) of those voting at the recall 

election shall be sufficient to effect a recall of the official from 
office, provided that, at least thirty percent (30%) of the total number 
of eligible voters vote in the recall election. In the event the official 
is recalled, the office shall be deemed vacant and shall be filled in 
accordance with Section 4 of this Article.

Section 2.  Expulsion and Suspension, of Tribal Legislators.

(a)  The Tribal Legislature shall by affirmative vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the 

entire Legislature expel a member of the Legislature from office on grounds of 
failure to attend three (3) successive regular meetings of the Tribal 
Legislature in a given Legislative year, without good reason as determined by 
the Tribal Legislature, lack of a required qualification for holding office, 
occurrence of a disqualification for office, or misuse of funds.

(b)  The Legislator sought to be expelled shall be notified in person or by 

registered mail at least ten (10) days before the holding of any meeting at 
which the Legislator's expulsion from office is to be considered. . The notice 
shall set forth the alleged grounds for expulsion with specificity. The 
Legislator in question shall be given full opportunity to be heard at such 
meeting and to confront any and all witnesses against him/her. If the Tribal 
Legislature votes to expel the Legislator in question, the grounds for removal 
shall be set forth with specificity in the minutes of the meeting, and the 
Legislature's decision shall be subject to prompt review by the Tribal 
Judiciary at the request of the expelled Legislator.

(c) 

In the event the decision of the Tribal Legislature to expel the Legislator in 
question is upheld by the Tribal Judiciary, the office shall be deemed vacant 
and shall be filled in accordance with Section 4 of this Article.

(d)  A Tribal Legislator may be suspended from office pending the appeal of the 

Legislator's conviction of a major crime by the vote of a majority of the total 
number of Tribal Legislators.

Section 3.  Automatic Vacancies.

(a)  The office of any elected tribal official who dies or resigns, who is convicted 

of a major crime, as defined in Bylaw V of this Constitution and Bylaws, shall 
be deemed to be automatically vacant. Resignation of office shall be written 
and shall be deemed to be effective as of the date tendered unless otherwise 
designated in the resignation document.

(b)  Any vacancy in office which occurs under this section shall be filled in 

accordance with Section 4 of this Article.

Section 4.  The Tilling of Vacancies In Office.

(a)  Any vacancy in the office of an elected tribal official shall be filled as 

follows:

(1  ) If the term of the office in question has more than one (1) year to run 

from the date of vacancy, the Tribal Legislature shall appoint within 
sixty (60) days an eligible Tribal member to fill such vacancy until the 
next tribal election; provided that, the Tribal Legislature shall 
exercise this right of appointment only once in any Legislative year. If 
any additional vacancies occur in the same year, they shall be filled by a 
special election.

2)  If the term of the office in question has one (1) year to run, the 

Tribal Legislature shall within two (2) months appoint by a majority vote 
of the total number of Legislators, an. eligible tribal member to fill the 
office; provided that, if a special election Is required to fill one or 
more other vacancies pursuant to subsection (a)(1) of this Section. 
The Tribal Legislature shall submit all vacancies to election.

(b)  Any special election required to be held under this Article shall be conducted 

in accordance with applicable provisions of this Constitution and Bylaws and 
with applicable tribal ordinance. If a regular election is scheduled to be 
held within the time permitted to hold a special election, all issues shall be 
submitted to vote at the regular election.

(c)  Any tribal official who, by operation of this Article, vacates his office shall 

not be eligible to succeed himself in that office.

(d) 

If, by reason of vacancies in office, the remaining members of the Tribal 
Legislature constitute less than five (5), the Election Commission shall cause 
all vacant offices to be filled by special election held in accordance with 
applicable provisions of this Constitution and Bylaws and applicable tribal 
ordinance.

(e)  Any tribal member appointed to office under the provisions of tills section 

shall be deemed to be subject to all provisions of this Article, and other 
Articles and. Bylaws of this Constitution and Bylaws, and. to other tribal 
ordinances generally applicable to elected tribal officials, and to his or her 
particular office.

Section 5. Tribal Judiciary Excluded. 

.

This Article shall not be applicable to the removal of Tribal Judges, nor to the 
filling of any vacancies in the office of Tribal Judge.
 
 

ARTICLE VIII - INITIATIVE AND REFERENDUM

 
 Section 1.  General Authority.

(a) 

Initiative. Eligible voters of the Tribe may propose any ordinance to the
Tribal Legislature for consideration, in accordance with the procedures set 
forth in this Article, except ordinances concerning the budget of the tribal 
government, appropriations of funds, levy of taxes, salaries of tribal 
officials, employees or appointees, or ordinances establishing tribal 
businesses. If .the Tribal Legislature votes not to enact the proposed 
ordinance, or if the Tribal Legislature votes to enact the proposed ordinance 
with substantive amendments, the proposed ordinance, in the original form and 
in the amended form if any, shall be submitted to the eligible voters of the 
Tribe at a tribal election for their approval or rejection in accordance with 
Section 5 of this Article.

(b)  Referendum.

(1)  By action of eligible voters. Eligible voters of the Tribe may require the 

Tribal Legislature to consider the repeal of any ordinance, in accordance 
with the procedure set forth in this Article, except ordinances concerning 
the budget of the tribal government, appropriations of funds, levy of 
taxes, salaries of tribal officials and employees or appointees, emergency 
ordinances, or ordinances establishing tribal businesses. And, if the 
Tribal Legislature fails to repeal such ordinance, the ordinances shall be 
submitted to the eligible voters of the Tribe at a tribal election for 
their approval or repeal in accordance with Section 5 of this Article.

(2)  By action of the Tribal Legislature. The Tribal Legislature, on its own 

motion, may submit at a tribal election any proposed ordinance or other 
proposed action of the Legislature to a vote of the eligible voters of the 
Tribe for their approval or rejection.

Section 2.  Procedure.

(a)  Petitioners' Committee. Any twenty-five (25) eligible voters of the Tribe may 

commence initiative or referendum proceedings by filing with the Tribal 
Election Commission an affidavit (1) stating their names, addresses and the 
address to which all notices regarding the petition are to be sent, and (2) 
that they will constitute the petitioner's committee and be responsible for 
circulating the petition and filing it in proper form and (3) if an initiative 
petition is involved, setting forth in full the proposed ordinance to be 
subject to this initiative proceeding; provided that, referendum proceedings 
shall be commenced no later than thirty (30) days after the Tribal Legislature 
enacts the ordinance.

(b) 

Issuance of Petition Forms. Promptly upon filing the affidavit of the 
petitioners' committee, the Tribal Election Commission shall prepare and issue 
an appropriate number of certified petition forms to the Committee.

(c)  Petitions.

(1)  Form and Content. Each petition form issued to the committee shall contain 
the full text of the ordinance in question. Every petition form issued 
shall be numbered and recorded. Every page of each petition form shall 
be attached as one instrument, shall be numbered as part of the whole, 
i.e., page 1 of 10 pages, and shall be certified as a page of the 
petition by the Tribal Election Commission. Every signature on the 
petition shall be followed by the address of the person who signed.

(2)  Number of signatures. Both initiative and referendum petitions must be 

signed by at least fifteen percent (15%) of the total number of eligible 
tribal voters.

(3)  Affidavit of Circulator. Each petition shall be circulated by one

person and upon filing a completed petition, that person shall attach his 
or her personal affidavit to the petition stating that he or she personally 
witnessed the signing of each signature and corresponding address 
contained in the petition, and that he or she believes each signature and 
corresponding address to be the name and address of the person who 
signed them, and that each person who signed the petition read or had 
explained to him or her the full text of the ordinance in question, and 
the purpose of the petition.

(d)  Time for Filing Petitions. Initiative or referendum petitions must be 

circulated and filed within thirty (30) days after issuance by the Tribal 
Election. Commission.

(e)  Certificate of Sufficiency. Within five (5) work days after a petition is  
filed, the Tribal Election Commission shall certify as to its sufficiency.

(1) 

shall state 

If Certified Insufficient. If the petition is certified insufficient, the 
Tribal Election  Commission 
in the certificate with
particularity the reasons it is insufficient. A copy of the certificate
of insufficiency shall be promptly sent to the petitioners' committee by 
registered mail, or served personally upon the committee. A petition 
certified insufficient for lack of required number of valid signatures may 
be supplemented once, and for this purpose an appropriate number of 
petition forms shall be mailed or given personally to the petitioners' 
committee along with the certificate of insufficiency. Such supplemental 
petition shall comply with the requirements of this section. Petitioners' 
committee shall have fifteen (15) days after receipt of the certificate of 
insufficiency to file a supplemental petition with the Tribal Election 
Commission. Within five (5) days after the filing of the supplemental 
petition, the Tribal Election Commission shall certify as to the 
sufficiency of the petition as supplemented and promptly send a copy of

such certificate to the petitioners' committee by registered mail, or 
shall serve a copy personally upon a member of the committee.

(2) 

If Certified Sufficient. If an original petition or a petition as 
supplemented in accordance with Section 2(e)(1) of this Article is 
certified as sufficient by the Tribal Election Commission, a copy of the 
certificate of sufficiency shall promptly be sent by registered mail to or 
served personally upon the petitioners' committee, and the certificate of 
sufficiency shall promptly be presented to the Tribal Legislature.

(f)  Review of Determination of Sufficiency. The final determination of the Tribal 

Election Commission in accordance with the procedure in Section 2(e) (1) of 
this Article that an initiative or a referendum petition is insufficient shall 
be reviewable as follows: The petitioners' committee must file a request 
for review with the Tribal Chairperson within ten (10) days after receipt 
of the final certificate notifying them of the insufficiency of their 
petition. Review shall first be made by the Tribal Legislature at its next 
meeting following the filing of the request for review. If the Tribal 
Legislature affirms the finding of the Tribal Election Commission, that 
decision may be appealed to the Tribal Judiciary in accordance with the rules 
of court procedure. Pending a final decision by the Tribal Judiciary, a new 
petition concerning the same matter may not be commenced.

(g)  Withdrawal of Petitions. An initiative or referendum petition may be withdrawn 

at any time prior to the final certification of sufficiency by filing with the 
Tribal Election Commission a request for withdrawal signed by a majority of the 
petitioners' committee. The petition shall have no further force or effect and 
 all proceedings thereon shall be terminated.

Section 3. Referendum Petitions: Suspension of Effect of Ordinance In Question......

When a referendum petition is certified as sufficient, by the Tribal Election 
Commission in accordance with the procedure set forth in Section 2 of this Article, 
the ordinance in question shall be suspended, if in effect, or from taking effect, 
if not in effect. Such suspension shall terminate if the petitioners' committee 
withdraws its petition or if a majority of eligible voters on submission of the 
ordinance in question to them for vote, vote to retain the ordinance.

Section 4. Action on Petitions.

(a)  Action by Tribal Legislature. When an initiative or referendum petition has 

been determined sufficient, the Tribal Legislature shall:

(1)  Enact the ordinance as submitted by an initiative petition; or

(2)  Repeal the ordinance, or part thereof, referred by a referendum petition; 

or

(3)  Decide to submit the proposal in a petition to the eligible voters of the 

Tribe; provided, however, that, the Tribal Legislature may change the 
detailed language of any proposed initiative ordinance and may affix the 
title thereto, so long as the general character of the measure will not be 
substantially altered.

Appropriate action by the Tribal Legislature shall be taken under this subsection 
within fifteen (15) days after a referendum petition is certified sufficient, and 
within thirty (30) days after an initiative petition is certified sufficient.

(b)  Submission to Voters. The election on an Initiated or referred ordinance shall 

be held within thirty (30) days after the date of the final Tribal Legislature 
vote thereon. Copies of the initiated or referred ordinance shall be made 
available to eligible voters not less than ten (10) days before the election 
and also at the polls at the time of the election.

Section 5. Results of Election.

(a) 

Initiative. If a majority of the eligible tribal, voters voting on a proposed 
initiated ordinance vote in its favor, it shall be considered effective upon 
certification of the election results. If conflicting-ordinances are approved 
at the same election, the one receiving the greater number of affirmative votes 
shall prevail.

(b)  Referendum. If a majority of the eligible tribal voters voting on a referred 

ordinance vote for repeal, it shall be considered repealed upon certification 
of the election results. If a majority of the eligible tribal voters voting on 
a referred ordinance vote to approve such ordinance, it shall be considered 
approved upon certification of the election results.

(c)  Voting Percentage Requirements. No initiative or referendum election shall be 

effective unless at least fifteen percent (15%) of the total number of eligible 
voters vote in that election.

Section 6. Re-enactment, Amendment or Repeal.

An ordinance initiated and adopted by the tribal voters may not be amended or 
repealed by the Tribal Legislature for a period of six (6) months after the date of 
the election at which it was adopted, and an ordinance referred and repealed by the 
tribal voters may not be re-enacted by the Tribal Legislature for a period of six 
(6) months after the date of the election at which it was repealed; provided, 
however, that, any such ordinances may be amended or repealed at any time by 
compliance with the provisions of this Article.
 
 

ARTICLE IX - RIGHTS OF TRIBAL MEMBERS AND OTHER 

PERSONS SUBJECT TO TRIBAL JURISDICTION

 
 Section 1. Hunting, Fishing, Trapping, Gathering.

In addition to such other rights as are guaranteed by this Constitution and Bylaws, 
members of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin shall have the right to hunt, 
fish, trap, and gather food from plants subject only to those tribal laws which are 
necessary to conserve these natural resources of the Tribe; provided that, this 
right shall not include the right to engage in commercial uses of such tribal 
resources; such right is reserved to the Tribe acting through its Tribal Legislature 
in accordance with Section 2 of Article X of this Constitution. Non-tribal members 
shall have no right to hunt, fish, trap, and gather foods from plants except as may 
be permitted by tribal ordinance approved by the Tribe in accordance with Section 3 
of Article VI of this Constitution.

Section 2. Rights of Persons Subject To Tribal Jurisdiction.

The Menominee Indian Tribe and its officers and agencies in exercising the powers 
of self-government over persons subject to tribal jurisdiction shall not:

(a)  establish an official government religion;

(b)  make or enforce any law (1) prohibiting the free exercise of religion or of the 

dictates of conscience, or (2) abridging the freedom of speech or of the press, 
or of peaceful assembly or association, or the right to petition for a redress 
of grievances;

(c)  violate a person's right to be safe against unreasonable searches and seizures 

of person and property;

(d)  permit searches and seizures unless a Tribal Court issues a warrant upon a 

sworn statement presented to the Tribal Court showing reasonable grounds to 
believe that an offense against the tribal law has been committed and that the 
person or place to be searched holds evidence of the offense or that the 
persons to be seized committed the offense; or that the thing to be seized is 
evidence of the offense, and describing specifically the person or place to be 
searched or the person or thing to be seized; provided that, searches and 
seizures may be permitted without a warrant where justified by compelling 
circumstances as shall be defined by ordinance.

(e)  Subject any person for the same offense to be put in jeopardy of loss of liberty 

more than once;

(f) 

In any criminal proceeding against any person:

(1) 

compel such person to be a witness against the person's own interest 
including any instance where the person's testimony reasonably might lead 
to the Institution of criminal proceedings against that, person;

(2)  deny such person the right to:

(a)  a speedy and public trial;

. 

(b) to be informed of the nature and cause of the accusation;

(c) 

to confront adverse witnesses;

(d) 

to have witnesses in such person's favor compelled to appear to 
testify; and

(e) 

to have, at such person's own expense, the assistance of counsel in 
defending against the accusation.

(3)  deny to any person who is accused of a major offense as defined in Bylaw 

V of this Constitution & Bylaws, the right to a trial by jury of not less 
than six (6) persons, provided that, such person affirmatively requests 
such right and further provided that any person accused of an offense 
not punishable by imprisonment, shall have such right only at such 
person's own expense.

(4) 

require excessive bail, impose excessive fines, or inflict cruel and 
unusual punishments. 
 
 

-

 
 (g)  Deny to any person the equal protection of tribal laws, provided that, this 

clause shall not be interpreted to grant to non-tribal members those rights and 
benefits to which the tribal members are entitled by virtue of their membership 
In the Tribe. 

. 

.

(h)  Deprive any person of liberty or property (1) without fully complying with 

procedural processes of tribal law, or (2) application of tribal laws which 
have no reasonable relation to the purpose for which they were enacted; and

(i)  Enact any law Imposing punishment on one person, or enact any law which makes 
an action a crime which was not a crime when such action was committed, or 
which Increases punishment for a crime committed before the effective date of 
the law, or which deprives a person in any accusatory proceeding of any 
substantial right or immunity to which the person was entitled before the 
effective date of the law.


ARTICLE X - LIMITED POWER OF TRIBAL LEGISLATURE TO 
TRANSFER OWNERSHIP OF, OR TO ENCUMBER, 

TRIBAL LAND OR INTERESTS THEREIN


Section 1. Limited Power To Transfer Tribal Land Out of Tribal Ownership.

The Tribal Legislature shall not transfer land or interests therein out of tribal 
ownership by any means unless, prior to any such proposed transfer taking effect, 
such proposed transfer is approved by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the total 
number of eligible voters of the Tribe, by the Secretary of the Interior, and by an 
Act of Congress; however, the Tribal Legislature may exchange tribal land for land 
of equal value, but any such, proposed exchange, prior to becoming effective, shall 
be approved by a vote of the. Tribe , in accordance with Section 3 of. Article VI of 
this Constitution.

Section 2. Limited Power to Encumber Tribal. Land.

(a)  Except as permitted in subsection (b) of this Section, the Tribal Legislature 

shall not pledge, mortgage, lease, grant licenses to use land, whether 
revocable or irrevocable, or otherwise encumber tribal land or interests 
therein, unless, prior to any such proposed encumbrance taking effect, such 
proposed encumbrance is approved by the Secretary of the Interior, and by a 
vote of a majority of the eligible tribal voters voting on the question, 
provided that, the total vote cast is at least fifteen percent (15%) of those 
entitled to vote.

(b)  The Tribal Legislature may authorize the following encumbrances by a vote of a 

majority of the entire Tribal Legislature:

(1)  Grants of permission to members of the Tribe and to qualified non-members, 
in accordance with Article XI of this Constitution, to use specified 
portions of tribal land for residential, agricultural, commercial, 
recreational, or industrial purposes.

(2)  Leases to members of the Tribe of specified portions of tribal land for 

residential, agricultural, commercial, recreational, or industrial 
purposes.

(3)  Grants of rights-of-way over tribal land or interests therein, for the 

purpose of providing municipal services, such as water, sewage disposal, 
electricity, telephone, and roads, to and for the benefit of tribal 
members, or the heirs and descendants of tribal members who hold a land 
use assignment pursuant to Section 2 of Article XI of this Constitution, 
or a lease.

(4)  Leases to United States or its agencies for the purposes of meeting 

eligibility requirements for federal housing programs; provided that, 
the term of such a lease shall be for the minimal period of time.

Section 3. Limited Power To Develop Natural Resources.

The Tribal Legislature shall not develop on a commercial or industrial basis any 
natural resources of the Tribe without the consent of a majority of the total number 
of eligible voters of the Tribe, except as otherwise specified in Article XI, 
Section 2 (d).

Section 4. Principle of Construction.

Section 2 of this Article shall not be construed to deny to the Tribal Legislature 
its governmental power and authority to regulate activities of tribal land for the 
Tribe's general welfare, including but not limited to, zoning, the regulation of 
commercial ventures, fishing, hunting, and other sports activities, and regulations 
for the purpose of promoting health, safety, welfare, and conservation.
 
 

ARTICLE XI - USE OF TRIBAL LAND BY TRIBAL MEMBERS 

AND -QUALIFIED NON-TRIBAL MEMBERS

 
 Section 1. Land Use and Natural Resources Conservation Plan.

(a)  Land Use and Natural Resources Conservation Plan.

The Tribal Legislature shall by ordinance establish a comprehensive land use 
and natural resources conservation plan, for lands and natural resources 
subject to tribal jurisdiction. Such plan shall include rules and procedures 
by which tribal members, and non-tribal members who qualify under Section 2 
of this Article, may obtain permission to use a specified parcel of tribal land 
for residential, agricultural, commercial, recreational, or industrial 
purposes, however, such permission shall not include any subsurface rights 
except as specifically authorized by the plan. Such plan shall also include 
rules and procedures by which tribal members may use the natural resources of 
the Tribe consistent with principles of conservation.

(b)  Land Use Assignments.

Permission to use tribal land for the purposes specified in subsection (a) of 
this Section shall be evidenced by a land use assignment issued to persons who 
qualify under Section 2 of this Article, in accordance with the land use plan. 
Copies of such assignments shall be filed and recorded by the Appropriate 
Tribal Official.

(c)  Land Use Assignments Not Transferable.

Permission to use tribal land shall be a right granted only to the person 
designated in the land use assignment. Such permission shall not be 
transferable by the permittee during his or her lifetime, and shall pass upon 
the death of the permittee in accordance with regulations and procedures 
established by the Tribal Legislature by ordinance.

Section 2. Use of Tribal Land By Non-Tribal Members.

(a)  General Prohibition.

Except as otherwise specified in this section persons who are not members of 
the Menominee Indian Tribe shall not be permitted to use tribal land for any 
purpose.

(b)  Heir or Descendent Exception.

A non-member who is an heir or descendent of a member of the Menominee 
Indian Tribe shall for purposes of determining inheritance of any land use 
assignment, have the same status as heirs or descendents who are members of 
the Tribe, provided that, where a non-member inherits the land use 
assignment, and notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in the land use 
assignment issued to the deceased tribal member, the term of such use 
assignment shall be deemed to be for twenty-five (25) years. The Tribal 
Legislature may renew such assignment for subsequent terms, each not to 
exceed twenty-five (25) years.

(c)  Consent to Abide by Tribal Law.

Any non-member who inherits a land use assignment from a tribal member shall 
thereby be deemed to have consented to abide by all laws of the Menominee 
Indian Tribe which would have been applicable to such land had the land use 
assignment in question been inherited by a tribal member, and, further such 
non-member shall be deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the Tribe 
for purposes of enforcing such laws.

(d)  Leases to Non-Tribal Members, Corporations or Businesses.

Leases of land located outside the geographical boundaries of the Menominee 
Reservation as defined by the 1854 Treaty held in trust by the United States 
for the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin, the Menominee Indian Tribe of 
Wisconsin may grant to non-tribal members, corporations, or businesses

for any legally permissible purpose pursuant to Tribal Law by majority vote of 
the Tribal Legislature acting through the Tribal Ordinance process in accordance 
with applicable provision under Bylaw II, Section 2, of this Constitution and 
Bylaws. The Tribal Legislature shall set forth the length of time of such 
leases, the fee, and such other provisions as the Tribal Legislature deems 
necessary.
 
 

ARTICLE XII - SUCCESSOR BUSINESSES TO 

MENOMINEE ENTERPRISES

 
 Section 1.  Duty of the Tribal Legislature.

The Tribal Legislature shall reaffirm by resolution the "Management Plan of 
Menominee Enterprises, a Tribal Enterprise of the Menominee Indian Tribe of 
Wisconsin," (hereinafter referred to as the "Menominee Enterprises Plan") approved 
by Congress on March 14, 1975 pursuant to Section 6 of the Menominee Restoration 
Act (87 Stat. 770), in accordance with Section 14(d) of the "Menominee Enterprises 
Plan." The Tribal Legislature shall amend the "Menominee Enterprises Plan" so that 
the provisions of that document are consistent with the provisions of Section 2 of 
this Article. Amendments to the "Menominee Enterprises Plan" shall not be 
inconsistent with any provision of Section 2 of this Article.

Section 2.  Successors to Menominee Enterprises.

Before the Tribal Legislature takes any action terminating the "Menominee 
Enterprises Plan" pursuant to Section 14(d) of that document, or before the Tribal 
Legislature takes any action terminating any successor to Menominee Enterprises 
established pursuant to this Article, the Tribal Legislature shall establish a 
successor tribal business (hereinafter "Successor Business") which shall assume 
control of the management responsibilities, and all books and records of the 
predecessor business. The Successor Business shall be the principle business arm 
of the Tribe and shall be established by means of a written charter issued by the 
Tribal Legislature by ordinance. The charter shall not be inconsistent with this 
Constitution and Bylaws and shall include, be consistent with, and be based upon 
the following principles:

(a)  Management Policy.

The Tribal Legislature in providing for the management of the tribal forest 
lands by the Successor Business shall follow the policy of promoting maximum 
self-determination of the Menominee Indian Tribe. The Tribal Legislature in 
dealing with the United States in the management of tribal land and interests 
therein shall seek federal protection of the right of the Tribe to self
determination and shall avoid federal domination. All tribal forest lands 
shall be managed on a sustained yield basis according to the provisions of the 
Forest Management Plan: Menominee Enterprises, Inc. 1968-1982 (1973
Revision) including any revisions which may in the future be made in that 
document.

(b)  Scope of Authority of the Successor Business to Menominee Enterprises.

The scope of authority of the Successor Business shall be to manage and 
operate the property designated in this subsection (hereinafter referred to as 
the "subject property") in order to conduct the business operations of the 
Tribe which will best promote the interests of the Tribe and of the Tribal 
members. Accordingly, the primary duties of the Successor Business shall be 
to log, manage, and reforest the tribal forest land, and to manufacture, 
market, sell and distribute timber, forest products, and related products. The 
Successor Business shall be granted all powers necessary to manage and 
operate the subject property in order properly to perform its duties as set 
forth herein. The Successor Business shall also have the power to operate 
subsidiary businesses which come within its scope of authority in order to 
further the business and economic needs of the. Tribe insofar as the manage
ment and operation of the subject property is concerned.

The property subject to the control of the Successor Business shall be that 
property formerly managed and controlled by Menominee Enterprises and any 
other predecessor business, including the tribal mill, the tribal forest land, 
the personal property of the predecessor business, and such additional 
 property as may be acquired by the Successor Business in the future. The 
Successor Business shall have no interests therein, except the right to manage 
such property in accordance with the principles set forth in this section and 
in its tribal charter. Tribal land and interests therein shall not be an asset 
of the Successor Business for any purpose. No tribal property, real or 
personal, or interests therein, shall be subject to the management and control 
of the Successor Business unless such property shall have been expressly 
stated in this subsection to be subject to the management and control of the 
Successor Business. The Successor Business shall not be authorized to pledge, 
mortgage, lease, or otherwise encumber tribal land or interests therein except 
as may be authorized by the Tribal Legislature acting in accordance with 
applicable Federal. Law, tribal ordinances, and this Constitution and Bylaws.

The Successor Business shall be authorized to acquire and own land or 
interests therein in its own name. The Successor Business shall be authorized 
to sell for business purposes any property owned by it in its own name and 
shall also be authorized to pledge, mortgage or otherwise encumber its own 
property as security for debts.

The Tribal Legislature shall have no authority over the operations of the 
Successor Business except as specifically set forth in this section. However, 
the Tribal Legislature shall retain all authority and power to exercise all 
proper governmental and sovereign functions over the property managed or 
owned by the Successor Business.

(c)  Sovereign Immunity.

The Menominee Indian Tribe in authorizing the establishment by charter of the 
Successor Business does not waive, nor authorize its Tribal Legislature to 
waive, or limit the right of the Tribe or the Successor Business to sovereign 
immunity from suit, except as specifically provided in this subsection; nor 
does it waive or limit, or authorize its Tribal Legislature to waive or Limit 
any exceptions and immunities from taxation to which the Successor Business is 
or may in the future be entitled, and to which the Tribe, its members, and its 
businesses are entitled by law.

For the purpose of enabling the Successor Business to enter into business 
agreements either to secure debts or to provide services or products, the 
Successor Business shall be authorized to agree by specific written agreement 
with any party to sue and be sued in its capacity as a tribal business upon 
any contract, claim, or obligation arising out of its authorized activities. 
For the same purpose, the Successor Business shall be authorized to agree by 
specific written agreement with any party to waive any immunity from suit it 
might otherwise have.

(d)  Distribution of Profits of the Successor Business.

The profits of the Successor Business shall be allocated in the manner set 
forth in this subsection.

(1)  The Successor Business shall, as soon as practicable, make a determination 
of the net profits of the Successor Business for each fiscal year. That 
profit shall be determined from revenues; cost of sales; operating 
expenses; general income and expenses; taxes, if any; and interest 
payments on the outstanding bonds administered in accordance with the 
bond indenture dated April 30, 1961, First Wisconsin Trust Company as 
trustee, and on any outstanding: supplemental bond indentures.

(2)  Excess profits shall then be determined by subtracting from net profits 

such amounts as are deemed appropriate by the Board of Directors for 
expansion, for asset replacement, and for sinking fund or a reserve to 
retire the principal obligation on the bond indentures named in subsection 
(d)(1) of this section.

(3)  Excess profits shall then be divided by the Board of Directors on an 

equitable basis between an amount to be retained by the Successor 
Business (hereafter "retained share") and an amount to be paid over by 
the Successor Business to the Tribal Legislature, representing the Tribe 
(hereafter "tribal share"). In making the division between the retained 
share and the tribal share, the Board of Directors shall consult 
extensively with the Tribal Legislature and shall be guided by industry 
standards.

(4)  The Tribal Legislature shall then determine whether the tribal share shall 

be utilized for tribal operations, distributed to tribal members, or 
divided and used for both purposes. In making its determination as to 
the distribution of the tribal share, the Tribal Legislature shall use its 
best judgement and shall carefully consider both the need for effective 
tribal operations and the individual financial needs of tribal members.

(e)  Authority, Duties, and Rights of the Board of Directors of the Successor 

Business.

In addition to such other authority granted by this section and to such other 
authority as may be granted by the Successor Business charter, not inconsistent 
with this Constitution and Bylaws, the Board of Directors of the Successor Business 
shall be granted the following authority and rights and shall be directed as follows:

(1)  The Board of Directors of the Successor Business shall be authorized to 

vote themselves a reasonable compensation for services; but any increase 
in compensation shall not take effect during the term of office of any 
Director serving at the time the increase was voted upon.

(2)  Directors shall be subject to recall on grounds of dishonesty, 

incompetency, nonparticipation in Board matters, or other conduct 
detrimental to the interests of the Tribe or the Successor Business.

(3)  The Board of Directors of the Successor Business shall be authorized to 

elect and remove officers of the Board and officers of the Successor 
Business, and to fill vacancies in such offices, in accordance with the 
procedure set forth in subsection 2(e) (4) of this Section.

(4)  The Board of Directors shall be authorized to appoint a tribal member to 

fill the vacant office until the next annual election when a tribal member 
shall be elected to complete the term of office in question.

(5)  The Board of Directors shall be authorized to determine the amount of 

excess profits of the Successor Business to be retained by the Successor 
Business (retained share), and the amount to be paid over to the Tribal 
Legislature on behalf of the Tribe (tribal share) in accordance with the 
formula set forth in subsection (d) of this Section.

(6)  The Board of Directors shall be authorized to amend the following parts of 
the charter of the Successor Business: the part which concerns the 
internal rules and regulations of the Board of Directors, that part which 
concerns the meetings of the Board of Directors and voting at such 
meetings, that part which concerns the officers of the Board of Directors, 
and that part which concerns the location of the principle place of 
business of the Successor Business.

(7)  The Board of Directors, its officers, and the officers of the Successor 

Business, shall be Indemnified from any court awarded damages that might 
result from the performance of the duties of office.

(8)  The Board of Directors shall meet at least four (4) times a year to

transact the business of the Successor Business.

(f)  Rights of the Tribal Members.

(1)  There shall be twelve (12) members of the Board of Directors. All 

Directors of the Board of Directors of the Successor Business shall be 
tribal members with at least one-fourth (1/4) degree Menominee Indian 
blood elected at large for three (3) year terms of office. The terms of 
office shall be staggered such that four (4) of the twelve (12) Directors 
are elected annually.

(2)  Eligible voters of the Tribe shall have the right to vote for members of 

the Board of Directors of the Successor Business, as. well as on other 
matters submitted to the tribal voters for. a vote at regular and special 
business meetings of the Successor Business. Write-in voting, and 
absentee voting shall be permitted, but voting by. proxy, and cumulative 
voting shall not be permitted.

(3)  Eligible tribal voters shall have the right to recall members of the Board 

of Directors in accordance with the following procedure: upon receipt of 
a petition signed by two hundred (200) eligible voters, setting forth the 
alleged misconduct with specificity, the Secretary or other appropriate 
officer of the Successor Business shall call and give notice of a special
meeting of the tribal members. Such meeting shall be held in not less
than ten (10) nor more than thirty (30) days after receipt of such
petition. At such meeting, eligible tribal voters shall vote on the
question of whether the Director in question shall be removed from office 
on the basis of one or more of the grounds set forth in the petition. No 
Director shall be removed from office unless (a) at least thirty percent 
(30%) of all eligible voters participate in the recall election and (b) at 
least two-thirds (2/3) of the eligible voters participating in the recall 
election vote in favor of removal.

(4)  The tribal members shall have the right to have an annual business 

meeting of tribal members held to receive reports on business operations, 
to elect directors, and to transact other business.

(5)  Eligible tribal voters shall have the right to petition for special 

business meetings of the tribal members in accordance with the following 
procedure:

The Secretary of the Successor Business shall call such a meeting upon 
receipt of a written petition which is signed by not less than two hundred 
(200) eligible voters and which sets forth with specificity the business 
to be transacted at the special meeting. The Secretary shall notify 
eligible voters of the meeting by posting notice in accordance with Bylaw 
II, Section 4, of this Constitution and Bylaws. Such notice shall state 
the place, day, hour and the purpose or purposes for which the meeting 
is called. Such notice shall be posted not less than ten (10) nor more 
than fifty (50) days before the date of the meeting. If the place of 
meeting is not designated in the notice, the place of meeting shall be the 
office of the Successor Business, but any such meeting may be adjourned 
to reconvene at any place designated by a vote of a majority of eligible 
voters who are present at the meeting. No business shall be transacted at 
any special meeting except as designated in the notice of the meeting.

(6)  There shall be at least one hundred and twenty-five (125) eligible tribal 

voters present at business meetings of the tribal members before business 
can be conducted at such meetings.

(7)  To be included on the ballot for election to the Board of Directors, a 

candidate must be named in a nominating petition which is signed by at 
least seventy-five (75) eligible voters and filed, with the appropriate 
officer of the Successor Business at least thirty (30) days before the 
annual business meeting to elect the Board members.

(g) 

Involvement of the United States.

The United States Government shall not be granted any authority in regard to the 
operation of the Successor Business, except as specifically negotiated and agreed 
upon in a written trust agreement between the United States and the Menominee 
Indian Tribe.
 
 

ARTICLE XIII - TRIBAL BUSINESSES

 
 Section 1. Interrelationship Between Tribal Businesses And The 

Tribal Legislature.

All business ventures of the Tribe shall be conducted by tribal businesses 
established by written charters issued by the Tribal Legislature by ordinance. Such 
tribal businesses shall be established for purposes of management only and no tribal 
assets shall be transferred to the ownership of such business; however, such 
business may be authorized to acquire property in its own name. Such tribal 
businesses shall not be authorized to pledge, mortgage, lease, or otherwise
encumber tribal lands or interests therein subject to their management. However,
such tribal business may, consistent with Federal law, be authorized to pledge, 
mortgage, lease, and otherwise encumber land or interest therein held in its own
name as security for debts, and to acquire, sell, lease, exchange, transfer, or
assign personal property or interests therein. Each tribal business shall be 
subject to the authority and control of a Board of Directors, or such other form of 
management as the Tribal Legislature designates in the charter. The Tribal 
Legislature shall not interfere with the business decisions of the management of the 
business; however, the Tribal Legislature shall retain all authority and power to 
exercise all proper governmental and sovereign functions over the tribal business 
and over property managed or owned by the tribal business. Profits of such tribal 
businesses shall be shared with the Tribe on an equitable basis. Regular reports on 
the financial status of such tribal businesses shall be made to the Tribal 
Legislature and to the tribal members.

Section 2. Duty to Enforce.

The Tribal Legislature shall enforce this Article by a code of laws establishing, 
insofar as practicable, uniform rules governing the establishment and operation of 
tribal businesses.

Section 3. Forestry Business Exception. 
 
 

-

 
 This Article shall not be applicable to the forestry business of the Tribe which is 
covered by Article XII of this Constitution.
 
 

AMENDMENT

TO ARTICLE XIII OF
MENOMINEE CONSTITUTION AND BYLAWS

 
 article XIII

Section 4. Other Powers and Rights of all Tribal Businesses, Including Kenosha 

Gaming Business.

(a) Any tribal gaming conducted in Kenosha, Wisconsin, shall be conducted through a 
tribal gaming business chartered by the Tribal Legislature which shall have all the 
powers of a tribal business under Section 1 of this Article. The Tribal Legislature 
may delegate such governmental powers as it deems necessary or convenient to 
the tribal gaming business or any. other tribal business chartered under this Article. 
The Tribal Legislature may lease land in Kenosha to the tribal gaming business and 
may lease other tribal land on or off the reservation to any other tribal business 
chartered under this Article.

(b)

(c)

(d)

Any charter issued under this article may authorize the tribal gaming business or 
other tribal business to consent in writing to be sued in any court of competent 
jurisdiction, and/or to consent to arbitration or mediation of disputes. The Tribe 
may guarantee contracts entered into by the Tribal gaming business, and may 
consent to be sued in any court of competent jurisdiction, and/or to arbitration or 
mediation, to enforce any such guarantees. Exhaustion of tribal remedies shall 
not be required in any such suit, arbitration, or mediation, by or against the tribal 
gaming business or the Tribe. . This Section 4 constitutes authority to grant a 

limited waiver of immunity.

In any suit for monetary damages against the Tribe or the. tribal gaming business 
authorized by this Section 4, recovery of such monetary damages shall be limited 
to the undistributed or future net revenues or other assets of the tribal gaming 
business.

In the event of any conflict between this Section 4 and any other provision of this 
Constitution and ByLaws, this Section shall govern; provided, however, the Tribal 
Legislature shall not waive or limit the right of the Menominee Indian Tribe to be. 
immune from suit, except as authorized by this Article, Article XII, and Article 
XVIII of this Constitution. 

. 

.

 CERTIFICATE OF APPROVAL .

I, LARRY MORRIN, Area Director, Minneapolis Area Office, Bureau of Indian Affairs, by 
virtue of the authority granted to the Secretary of the Interior by the Act of June 18, 1934 (48 Stat. 
984), as amended, and further delegated to me by 10 BIAM Bulletin 13, as extended by Bulletin 
9901, do hereby approve Amendment A, now designated as Amendment Number I, to the 
Constitution and Bylaws of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin. This amendment is effective 

as of this date: PROVIDED, that nothing in this approval shall be construed as authorizing any 
action under this document that would be contrary to Federal law.
 
 

 
ARTICLE XIV - TRUST AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE MENOMINEE 

INDIAN TRIBE AND THE UNITED STATES

 
 Section 1. 

Trust Agreement.

Upon taking office, the Tribal Legislature shall enter into negotiations with the 
United States Ear the purpose of executing the kind of trust agreement between the 
Tribe and United States as Is contemplated in Section 4 of the "Trust and 
Management Agreement between the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin and the 
Secretary of the Interior of the United States of. America" (hereinafter "Trust and 
Management Agreement"). Such agreement shall provide the Menominee Indian Tribe 
with maximum control over its own property and its own affairs and shall define 
accordingly the long-term, ongoing trust relationship between the Tribe and the 
United States.

The Tribal Legislature shall make every effort to execute such a long-term trust 
agreement prior to the expiration of the "Trust and Management Agreement," now in 
effect and scheduled to expire six (6) months after the date on which the Tribal 
Legislature takes office. If the long-term agreement cannot be executed prior to 
the expiration of the "Trust and Management Agreement," the Tribal Legislature 
shall reaffirm the "Trust and Management Agreement" pursuant to Section. 3 of that 
Agreement until such date as a new long-term agreement is executed.

Section 2. 

Negotiating Principles.

The Tribal Legislature in negotiating a long-term trust and management agreement 
with the United States shall be bound by the following principles which the 
Menominee Indian Tribe considers fundamentally important parts of such an 
agreement:

(a)  The United States should expressly acknowledge that the Menominee Indian Tribe 
has the right to be self-determining to the maximum possible extent while still 
preserving the integrity of the trust responsibility of the United States to 
the Tribe. This includes the right to manage and control all - tribal 
businesses, and the right to tax all assets within the Tribe’s jurisdiction, 
including tribal assets held in trust.

(b)  The powers and responsibilities of the United States as trustee should be 

expressly and specifically set forth in the agreement.

(c)  The United States should expressly agree that the tribal forest land shall be 

managed on a sustained yield basis.

(d)  The United States should expressly acknowledge that all tribal assets 

transferred to the United States in trust for the Tribe shall, as of the date 
of this transfer, be exempt from all local, state and federal taxation; and 
that the Tribe, the tribal assets, the tribal members, and the tribal 
businesses shall be entitled to all immunities from taxation to which American 
Indian Tribes, their members, and their businesses are entitled by the laws of 
the United States.

(e)  The United States should expressly agree to provide business advice and other 

advice and assistance to the Tribe on request of the Tribe.

(f)  The United States should expressly acknowledge the Tribe’s right to exercise 

all sovereign and governmental powers within the boundaries of the Menominee 
Indian Reservation except those which the United States Congress has 
expressly and specifically denied the Tribe the right to exercise.

Section 3. Approval by Tribe Required.

Any long-term agreement negotiated pursuant to Section 1 of this Article between 
the Menominee Indian Tribe and the United States shall be effective only if such 
agreement is approved by vote of a majority of tribal voters voting, so long as the 
total vote cast is at least fifteen percent (15%) of those- entitled to vote. 
Amendments to such agreement shall be effective only if approved in the same 
manner as the agreement.
 
 

ARTICLE XV - TRIBAL GOVERNMENT CAREER AND MERIT 

SYSTEM OF EMPLOYMENT

 
 Section 1.  Merit Principle.

All employment and promotions of employees of the tribal government shall be made 
solely on the basis of merit and fitness as demonstrated by examinations or other 
evidence relevant to show competence for the particular employment in question. All 
termination of employment with the tribal government shall be made solely on the 
basis of incompetence, or any other reason which results in failure to perform 
employment duties satisfactorily. Tribal employees shall adhere to the personnel 
policies and procedures. This section shall apply to appointed tribal officials, 
but not to elected tribal officials or tribal judges.

Section 2.  Duty to Enforce.

The Tribal Legislature shall enforce this Article by ordinance.

Section 1. 

Budget and Appropriations.
 
 

ARTICLE XVI - FINANCIAL CONTROL

 
 All appropriations by the Tribal Legislature o tribal funds shall be in accordance 
with an annual budget established by ordinance.

Section 2. 

Accounting System.

The Tribal Legislature shall by ordinance establish an accounting system, approved 
by an independent certified public accounting firm, and shall cause an audit of the 
tribal accounts to be conducted annually. 

.

Section 3. Fiscal Year.

The Tribal Legislature shall by ordinance establish a fiscal year for the tribal 
government.

Section 1. Conflicting Personal Financial Interest Prohibited.
 
 

ARTICLE XVII - CONFLICT OF INTEREST

 
 In carrying out the duties of tribal office, no tribal official, elected or 
appointed, shall, make or participate in making decisions which involve balancing a 
substantial personal financial interest, other than interests held in common by all 
tribal members, against the best interests of the Tribe.

Section 2. 

Other Conflicts of Interest..

The Tribal Legislature may by ordinance prohibit other kinds of conflicts of 
interests.

Section 1. General Prohibition.
 
 

ARTICLE XVIII - SOVEREIGN IMMUNITY

 
 The Tribal Legislature shall not waive or limit the right of the Menominee Indian 
Tribe to be immune from suit, except as authorized by this Article and by Article 
XII of this Constitution.

Section 2. Sults Against The Tribe In Tribal Courts By Persons 

Subject To Tribal Jurisdiction.

The Menominee Indian Tribe shall be subject to suit in Tribal Courts by persons 
subject to tribal jurisdiction for the purpose of enforcing rights and duties 
established by this Constitution and Bylaws, by the ordinances of the Tribe, and by 
the Indian Civil Rights Act, (25 U.S.C. s1301 and 1302). The Tribe does not, 
however, waive or limit any rights which it may have to be immune from suit in the 
courts of the United States or of any State.

Section 3. Suits Against The Tribe In The Courts of The United 

States.

In seeking redress of grievances against the Tribe, persons subject to tribal 
jurisdiction shall exhaust all remedies available to them under this Constitution 
and Bylaws and the ordinances of the Tribe before seeking redress of grievances 
against the Tribe in the courts of the United States under any law of the United 
States granting those persons such rights.
 
 

ARTICLE XIX - AMENDMENTS TO CONSTITUTION AND BYLAWS

 
 This Constitution and Bylaws Is adopted pursuant to Section 16 of the Indian 
Reorganization Act (25 U.S.C. s476, 48 Stat. 987) and may be amended in 
accordance with the rules and regulations adopted by the Secretary of the Interior 
pursuant to that section. The Secretary of the Interior shall hold an election on 
the adoption of an amendment or amendments to this Constitution and Bylaws when 
requested by a vote of two-thirds (2/3) of. the entire Tribal Legislature or by a 
petition signed by at least three hundred (300) eligible tribal voters and validated 
in accordance with applicable rules of the Secretary, or if none, with applicable 
tribal ordinance. The Secretary of the Interior shall not propose amendments to 
this Constitution and Bylaws.
 
 

ARTICLE XX - ADOPTION OF CONSTITUTION AND BYLAWS

 
 This Constitution and Bylaws, when adopted by a majority vote of the eligible voters 
of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin, voting in an election called for that 
purpose by the Secretary of the Interior, in which at least thirty percent (30%) of 
those entitled to vote shall cast their ballots, and submitted to the Secretary of 
the Interior for his approval, shall be effective from the date of approval.
 
 

BYLAWS

 
 BYLAW I - OFFICERS AND COMMITTEES OF THE TRIBAL LEGISLATURE:

DUTY TO VOTE STOCK OF MENOMINEE ENTERPRISES, INC.

Section 1. Officers of the Tribal Legislature.

(a)  Number. There shall be three officers of the Tribal Legislature. A Chairperson, 
a Vice-Chairperson, and a Secretary. No Legislator shall hold more than one 
(1) of these offices simultaneously.

(b)  Election and Terms of Office. The Chairperson, the Vice-Chairperson and the 

Secretary shall be elected by the Tribal Legislature in accordance with rules 
and procedures established by the Legislature.

(c)  Qualifications. The Chairperson shall be a resident on the Menominee Indian 

Reservation.

(d)  Removal. A Legislator may be removed from the office of Chairperson,

Vice-Chairperson or Secretary by the Tribal Legislature on grounds of failure 
to perform adequately the duties. of the office in question, or 
non-participation In business of the Legislature.

(e)  Vacancies. A vacancy in the office of Chairperson or Vice-Chairperson, or 

Secretary shall be filled by the Tribal Legislature for the unexpired portion 
of the term.

() Chairperson of the Tribal Legislature. The Chairperson shall receive a 

reasonable compensation for services. Such compensation shall not be increased 
or decreased during a Chairperson's term in office . The Tribal Legislature may 
authorize the Chairperson to serve full time in the office.

The duties and powers of the Chairperson shall include but not be limited to the 
following:

(1)  Preside at all meetings of the Tribal Legislature and at any other meeting 

called by the Tribal Legislature at which the Chairperson may be 
designated to preside.

(2)  Represent the Tribal Legislature in its relations with other governments, 

but only where the Tribal Legislature has specifically and expressly 
authorized the Chairperson to do so provided that, the Tribal 
Legislature shall not authorize the Chairperson to take any action which 
under this Constitution and Bylaws must be taken by the Legislature.

(3)  Appoint members of all committees of the Tribal Legislature subject to 

the approval of the Legislature and in accordance with rules of procedure 
of the Legislature.

(4)  Serve as an ex officio member of all committees of the Tribal 

Legislature.

(5)  Call special meetings when appropriate of the Legislature and of any 

committee of the Legislature, in accordance with this Constitution and 
Bylaws, laws of the Tribe, and rules of procedure of the Legislature.

(6)  Receive reports of all committees of the Legislature and deliver such 
reports or cause such reports to be delivered to the Legislature.

(7)  Exercise supervision over all committees of the Legislature and recommend 

to the Legislature the establishment, consolidation, or abolition of 
Legislative committees.

(8)  Be responsible for the administrative details of calling and holding 

meetings of the Legislature and of the tribal members.

(9)  Perform such other duties as may be prescribed by this Constitution 
and Bylaws, by ordinance, or as required by the Tribal Legislature.

(g)  Vice-Chairperson of the Tribal Legislature. The Vice-Chairperson of

the Tribal Legislature shall perform the duties of the Chairperson when the 
Chairperson is absent or unable to perform his duties, or as long as the office 
is vacant. In addition, the Vice-Chairperson: shall perform such other duties 
as may be prescribed by this Constitution, by ordinance, or as required by the 
Tribal Legislature.

(h)  Secretary of the Tribal Legislature. The Secretary of the Tribal 

Legislature shall perform the duties of the -Chairperson when the 
Chairperson and the Vice-Chairperson are absent or unable to perform 
such duties. The Secretary shall also perform such other duties as may 
be required by the Tribal Legislature.

Section 2. 

Committees of the Tribal Legislature.

The Tribal Legislature shall establish such committees as it deems appropriate to 
provide research, investigating and advisory assistance to the Legislature in the 
exercise of its powers, provided that, each committee shall be headed by a Tribal 
Legislator.

Section 3. 

Duty to Vote Stock of Menominee Enterprises, Inc.

The stock of Menominee Enterprises, Inc., which was transferred to the Tribe by 
the document entitled, "Transfer, Assignment and Special Endorsement of Security" 
made pursuant to the Menominee Transfer Plan submitted and approved by the 
Congress of the United States pursuant to Section 6 of the Menominee Restoration 
Act (87 Stat. 772) shall be voted by the Tribal Legislature. The Tribal Legislature 
shall also exercise all other rights in regard to such stock.
 
 

BYLAW II - PROCEDURE OF THE TRIBAL LEGISLATURE

 
 Section 1. Meetings of the Tribal Legislature.

(a)  Regular Meetings.

The Tribal Legislature shall meet in official session at least four (4) times a 
year at such time and place as shall be established by ordinance. The order of 
business for any such meeting shall be posted In accordance with Section 4 of 
this Bylaw; however, other business may also be transacted at such meeting if 
the Tribal Legislature votes to consider such other business.

(b)  Special Meetings.

(1)  Calling and Notice.

Special meetings of the Tribal. Legislature shall be called by the Chairperson 
of the Legislature or upon the written request of any two (2) Legislators, 
provided that, at least seventy-two (72) hours written notice of such 
meeting shall be given to each Legislator, by personal service or by registered 
mail sent to the Legislator's usual place of residence, or left at the 
Legislator's usual place of residence with some person of suitable age and 
discretion residing there; however, notice may be waived by attendance at the 
meeting. Notice to tribal members shall be posted as provided in Section 4 of 
this Bylaw promptly after such meeting is called. Special meetings of the 
Tribal Legislature shall be called by the Chairperson upon the petition of 
three hundred (300) eligible tribal voters, provided that, not less than 
five (5) nor more than thirty (30) days notice of such meeting is given to 
tribal members. 

.

(2)  Business.

No business shall be transacted at any special meeting of the Tribal 
Legislature unless such business has been stated in the notice of such 
meeting. However, any business which may lawfully come before a regular 
meeting may be transacted at a special meeting if all the members of the 
Legislature consent in writing.

(3)  Emergencies.

A special meeting of the Tribal Legislature may be called upon less than 
seventy-two (72) hours written notice if such meeting is necessary for the 
preservation or protection of the health, welfare, peace, safety, or property 
of the Tribe. Efforts shall be made to give maximum practical notice to each 
Tribal Legislator. Maximum practical notice shall be given to such meeting, 
and such notice shall be posted as provided in Section 4 of this Bylaw, 
promptly after such meeting is called. No business other than that stated in 
the notice shall be transacted.

(c)  Open Meetings and Executive Sessions.

All meetings of the Tribal. Legislature called pursuant to this Bylaw shall be 
open to tribal members; and tribal members shall have a reasonable opportunity 
to be heard under such rules and regulations as the Legislature may prescribe, 
provided, however, that the Legislature may meet in executive session for the 
following purposes:

(1)  Personnel matters.

(2) 

Claims against the Tribe or the Tribal. Legislature, whether in litigation

or otherwise.

(3)  Legal consultation and advice.

(4)  Matters involved in litigation concerning the Tribe or the Tribal 

Legislature.

(5)  Deliberation and/or review of any matter heard by the Legislature in a 

quasi-judicial capacity.

(6)  Negotiations concerning the purchase, sale, lease or other acquisition of 

real or personal property, or interests therein, or concerning any 
contracts except those required to be the subject of competitive bidding.
 
 

 
 
 The Tribal Legislature may determine not to keep a record o all or any part of 
the discussion in executive session; however, the general reason for such 
determination shall be recorded, and a record shall be kept o any action taken 
in executive session. Such record may be withheld from inspection by tribal 
members pending final disposition of the matter concerned.

(d)  Organization and Rules of the Tribal Legislature.

The Tribal Legislature shall adopt by motion written rules governing its own 
organization and procedure. Such rules shall be open and available to review 
by tribal members in accordance with Section 3 of this Bylaw.

Section 2. Ordinances, Resolutions, and Motions.

(a)  Kinds of Action by Tribal Legislature.

The Tribal Legislature shall act only by ordinance, resolution or motion. All 
acts of a general and permanent nature or those affecting compelling interests 
of the Tribe or tribal members shall be by ordinance. All other actions shall 
be in the form of resolutions or in the form of motions. Action by resolution 
shall be the form of action in which the purpose or policy underlying the 
action is expressly set forth. Action by motion shall be the form of action in 
which only the action taken is expressly set forth without an accompanying 
statement of. purpose of policy. Ordinances making appropriations, shall be 
confined to the subject of appropriations, but may include more than one 
appropriation.

(b)  Action by Ordinance Required.

In addition to such acts of the Legislature as are required by other provisions 
of this Constitution to be by ordinance, the following acts shall be by 
ordinance: an appropriation, creating an indebtedness, authorizing the
borrowing of money, levying a tax, establishing criminal: or civil penalties, 
and any act which places any burden upon or limits the use of private property 
without the consent of the owner, or which limits the freedom of tribal members 
to exercise rights to which they are entitled by virtue of their membership in 
the Tribe, or which limits any right granted by this Constitution and Bylaws to. 
any person.

(c)  Form of Ordinances. 

.

Every ordinance shall be introduced in written or printed form. The enacting 
clause of all ordinances shall be: BE IT ORDAINED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF 
THE MENOMINEE INDIAN TRIBE OF WISCONSIN.

(d)  Procedure Bor Passing Ordinances.

Except for emergency ordinances and ordinances organizing into codes other 
related and existing ordinances, the following procedure for enactment of 
ordinances shall be followed:

(1)  The ordinance shall be introduced at either a regular or special meeting 

of the Legislature by any Legislator or Legislators, and

(2)  The ordinance shall be read in full, and copies of the ordinance shall be 

made available to the Tribal Legislature and to tribal members at or 
before the meeting at which the ordinance is introduced.

(3)  After the first reading of the ordinance, in accordance with (2) above, it 

shall be approved with or without amendment, rejected, or tabled by vote 
of the Tribal Legislature.

(4) 

If the ordinance is approved on the first reading, it shall promptly be 
posted in full in accordance with Section 4 of this Bylaw, unless 
otherwise provided in this Constitution. The Legislature shall hold a 
tribal hearing on the ordinance not earlier than four (4) days nor later 
than fourteen (14) days after posting, and notice of the tribal hearing, 
specifying the day, hour, and place of the same, shall be included in the 
posting.

(5) 

If the ordinance is tabled, it shall be reconsidered at subsequent 
meetings until it is approved with or without amendment, or rejected, by 
vote of the Legislature.

(6)  The ordinance shall be read in full a second time at the tribal hearing 

for adoption, rejection, or other action as may be taken by vote of the 
Tribal Legislature.

(7)  Except as otherwise provided in this Constitution and Bylaws after 

adoption, an ordinance shall be posted by title only, stating that 
complete copies of the ordinance are available at the offices of the 
Tribal Legislature, and if the ordinance was amended subsequent to its 
last previous posting, the posting shall state that it has been amended 
and shall contain a summary of the subject matter of all amendments.

(8)  All ordinances shall take effect five (5) calendar days after posting 

following final passage, except as otherwise provided in this Constitution 
and Bylaws, or as specified in the ordinance itself.

(e)  Voting By The Legislature.

(1)  Ordinances.

Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, and except as may 
otherwise be provided in this Constitution and Bylaws, every ordinance 
shall be adopted at a regular meeting of the Tribal Legislature by the 
affirmative vote of at least a majority of the entire Tribal Legislators, 
provided that, the quorum for such meetings shall be five (5) Legislators.

(2)  Resolutions and Motions. 

.

Every resolution and motion shall be adopted by the affirmative vote of at 
least a majority of the Tribal Legislators present at a regular or special 
meeting of the Tribal Legislature; provided that, the quorum for such 
meetings shall be five (5) Legislators.

(f)  Review of Ordinances By Tribal Judiciary.

If in reviewing an ordinance, a Tribal court- finds a part or parts of the 
ordinance to be invalid, the Court shall determine whether the remaining parts 
of the ordinance are rendered inoperable as a result of the invalidity of the 
part or parts in question. If the Court determines that the ordinance is not 
rendered inoperable such ordinance shall, without the invalid part or parts, 
continue in effect.

(g)  Emergency Ordinances.

Emergency ordinances for the immediate preservation of public health, welfare, 
peace, safety, or property may be adopted by the Tribal Legislature- at any 
meeting at which the emergency ordinance is introduced. - The facts showing 
such urgency and: need shall be specifically stated, in the ordinance itself.. No 
ordinance making a grant of any special privilege shall ever be passed as an 
emergency ordinance. No action required by this Constitution and Bylaws to 
be taken by ordinance shall be taken by emergency ordinance. An emergency 
ordinance shall take effect immediately upon passage and, for information 
purposes, shall be posted or published in full promptly after passage. An 
emergency ordinance shall not be in effect longer than sixty (GO) days after 
passage, and shall not again be passed as an emergency ordinance.

(b)  Codification.

The Legislature shall, where appropriate, organize ordinances into codes and 
maintain such codes in current form. The Legislature shall periodically review 
the codes and ordinances and examine them for current need.

(1)  Technical Codes.

Standard technical codes, including amendments and revisions, promulgated by 
the Federal Government, or by any state, or by another Indian Tribe or by 
recognized trade or professional organizations may be adopted, in whole or in 
part, by reference in an adopting ordinance without reading or posting such 
codes in full. Such adopting ordinance shall also be deemed to adopt by 
reference, in whole or in part, any other codes incorporated in the adopted 
code. The enactment of ordinances adopting any such cods or codes shall be 
as provided in subsection (f) of this section, and the posting thereof shall 
state that copies of the code or codes proposed to be adopted are available for 
inspection at the office of the Tribal Chairperson. Any penalty clause in said 
code or codes may be adopted only if set forth in full in the adopting 
ordinance.

(j)  Amendment or Repeal.

No ordinance or section or subsection of an ordinance shall be amended, 
superseded, or repealed except by an ordinance: regularly adopted, provided 
that, repeal may be by reference to the title of the ordinance or any part 
thereof.

(k)  Authentication of Ordinances.

An ordinance as finally enacted shall be authenticated by the signature of the 
Chairperson of the Legislature or other person authorized by the Tribal 
Legislature. A true copy of every such authenticated ordinance shall be 
numbered and recorded in the official records of the Tribe. Attached to each 
ordinance and made a part thereof, shall be a certification by the Chairperson 
of the Tribe or other person authorized by the Legislature, that the same has 
been posted in accordance with this Constitution and Bylaws and any applicable 
tribal ordinance.

Section 3.  Tribal Records.

(a)  Tribal records shall include documents of all kinds and any other form of 

record keeping which result from the operation of both branches of the tribal 
government. Except as otherwise specifically provided by tribal ordinance, 
tribal records shall include, but not necessarily be limited to the following: 
records of meetings of the Legislature or of the General Council and any action 
taken therein; records of court proceedings and any court decisions or orders;
all correspondence, memoranda, and any other documents or other form of 
records produced by tribal officials or their agents while holding tribal 
office and during the performance of the duties of tribal office.

(b)  The Tribal Legislature may designate the form in which tribal records shall be 

kept.  The Tribal Legislature shall keep records of all actions taken by the
Tribal Legislature and its departments and other agencies. The Tribal 
Legislature, shall, if feasible, keep records of all debate and discussion 
underlying such actions. It shall also, if feasible, keep records of all 
action, debate and discussion at General council meetings. The Tribal 
Legislature, in consultation with the Supreme Court of the Tribal' Judiciary, 
shall provide for the keeping of all records of proceedings, decisions, and 
orders of the Tribal Judiciary. The Supreme Court of the Tribal Judiciary 
shall be responsible for implementing the record keeping system so established.

(c)  All tribal records shall be the exclusive property of the Menominee Indian 

Tribe, and shall be transferred by tribal officials leaving office to the 
appropriate tribal officials in office.

(d)  Tribal records shall be preserved in the files of the Tribal Legislature or, 
 where appropriate, in the files of the Tribal Judiciary. Except as provided in 
subsection (a) of this Section, all tribal records shall be fully accessible for 
review by any tribal member or his or her authorized representative, provided 
that, such review shall be conducted during normal office hours of the 
Legislature. The Tribal Legislature shall establish rules and procedures so 
that such review will be conducted in a reasonable manner so as to avoid undue 
disturbance of the daily operation of the. tribal government.

Section 4.  Posting Procedure.

following shall be the procedure of the Legislature in posting any notice,
The 
ordinance, or other document as required by tills Constitution and Bylaws or by
tribal ordinance.

(1)  The Legislature shall designate by ordinance no fewer than four (4) public

places within the reservation and an appropriate number of places in
appropriate urban areas where such posting shall be done. If any posting 
place is to be changed, the Legislature shall make such change by ordinance.

(2)  Posting shall take place as soon as practicable.
 
 

BYLAW III - GENERAL COUNCIL

 
 Section 1. Establishment Of General Council; Response To Recommendations.

(a)  There is hereby established a General Council which shall be a meeting called 

at least once a year by the Tribal Legislature and open to all tribal members. 
The purpose of the General Council shall be to discuss problems and issues 
concerning tribal affairs; to review the policies, goals, and priorities of the 
Tribal Legislature; to review the functioning of tribal programs and to make 
recommendations for change.

(b)  The Tribal Legislature shall respond to any recommendations of the General 

Council in writing and shall post such response in accordance with Bylaw II, 
Section 4 of the Bylaws of this Constitution.

Section 2. Annual General Council Meeting.

The Tribal Legislature shall set the time, date, and place for the annual meeting of 
the General Council, and shall provide reasonable notice to tribal voters of such 
meeting by posting such notice in accordance with Bylaw II, Section 4 of the Bylaws 
of this Constitution. The first item of business at the annual meeting of the 
General Council shall be an election to determine whether the Chairperson of the 
Legislature shall, chair such meeting or whether a tribal voter in attendance shall 
be elected from the floor to chair such meeting. The last item of business shall be 
a vote as to whether the meeting shall be adjourned or recessed; provided that, at 
least fifty (50) voters shall be required to recess a meeting.

Section 3. Special General Council Meeting.

(a)  The Tribal Legislature may call special. General Council meetings when it deems 

appropriate.

(b)  Tribal members may require the Tribal Legislature to call a General Council 

meeting for a specified purpose or purposes by presenting to the Tribal 
Legislature a petition with two hundred (200) signatures of eligible tribal 
voters, which petition shall specify the purpose or purposes for calling the 
meeting. The General Council meeting called pursuant to a petition shall be 
convened no later than thirty (30) days following the presentation of a valid 
petition.

Section 4. Election of Enrollment Committee.

The Enrollment Committee established by Article II, Section 3, of this Constitution 
may be elected at the annual General Council meeting; provided that, the 
quorum for the holding of such election shall be one hundred fifty (150) tribal 
voters. If a quorum is not present, the Tribal Legislature shall within two (2) 
months appoint the Enrollment Committee from applications submitted by tribal 
voters. The annual General Council meeting shall not be subject to recess insofar 
as the election of an Enrollment Committee is concerned. To be Included on the 
ballot for election to the Enrollment Committee, a candidate must be named in a 
nominating petition which is signed by at least seventy-five (75) eligible tribal 
voters and filed with the Tribal Legislature at least thirty (30) days before the 
annual General Council meeting. Absentee voting shall be permitted at such election.
 
 

BYLAW IV - OATH OF OFFICE

 
 Every tribal official shall, prior to assuming the duties of the office take the 
following oath of office:

I,__________________________ , do hereby solemnly swear
that I will support and defend the. Constitution and. 
Bylaws of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin, 
that I will carry out faithfully and impartially the 
duties of my office to the. best of my ability; and 
that I will promote and protect the best interests of 
the people of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin.
 
 

BYLAW V - DEFINITIONS

 
 As used in this Constitution and Bylaws, except as otherwise specifically 
provided or indicated by the context:

(a) 

"Major Crime" means any crime included in 18 U.S.C. sll53 and any 
equivalent crime defined under any state law.

(b) 

"Convicted of a major crime" means conviction of a crime, as defined in 
paragraph (a) of this Bylaw, where no further appeal is possible.

(c) 

"Tribal Official" means any person who is elected or appointed to office 
by the Tribal Legislature, including appointees to boards and commissions; 
however, this term shall not include members of the Board of Directors of 
Menominee Enterprises or any equivalent body of any successor business 
to Menominee Enterprises, or any person or persons appointed to manage a 
tribal business.

(d) 

"Tribal Funds" means all funds of the Menominee Indian Tribe, except 
funds derived from appropriations of the. United States or the State of 
Wisconsin.

(e)  "Tribal Law" means an ordinance or ordinances adopted by the Tribal 

Legislature.

() "Tribal Employees" means all persons regularly employed by the tribal 
government who receive monetary compensation, for their services.

(g) 

(h) 

(i) 

"Resident on the Reservation", "residence on the Reservation", or "reside 
on the Reservation" means physically residing within the exterior 
boundaries of the Menominee Indian Reservation as established by the 
Treaty of the Wolf. River of 1854 (10 Stat.. 1064) .

"Shall" in the context of provisions establishing the duties of the tribal 
government, means that compliance with the provision in question is 
mandatory, and may be compelled by order of the tribal court, after all 
administrative remedies have been exhausted.

"May", in the context of provisions establishing the duties of the tribal 
government, means that compliance with the provision in question is left 
to the discretion of the tribal government or its agents and may not be 
compelled by order of the tribal court, unless there is an abuse of 
discretion.
 
 

BYLAW VI - AMENDMENTS TO BYLAWS

 
 These Bylaws are an Integral part of this Constitution; therefore, these Bylaws 
shall be subject to amendment in the same manner as the Constitution, in 
accordance with Article XIX of the Constitution.

NOTES:

1) 

2) 

3) 

Pursuant to ss5(b) of the Menominee Restoration 
Act (P.L. 93-197; 87 Stat. 770), the Menominee 
Constitution and Bylaws was developed by the 
Menominee Restoration Committee and ratified on 
November 12, 1977.

Amendments to the Menominee Constitution and Bylaws 
(of 1977), were introduced and approved by a vote 
of the Menominee people May 21, 1990 . through May 
24, 1990.

(The four amendments are on record in the Office 
of the Menominee Tribal Chairperson)

A revision of the Menominee Constitution and Bylaws
(of 1977), was approved by a vote of the Menominee 
people January 29, 1991 through January 30, 1991.

(The sixteen amendments are on record in the 
Office of the Menominee Tribal Chairperson)

United States Department of the Interior
BUREAU Of INDIAN AFFAIRS 
WASHINGTON, D.C. 20245

IN REPLY REFER TO:

Tribal Government Services - TR

FEB 15 1991

Mr. Earl J. Barlow
Area Director, Minneapolis
15 South Fifth Street
Minneapolis, Minnesota 55402

Dear Mr. Barlow:

We have received the results of the election held on January 29-30, 1991, by 
the qualified voters of the Menominee Tribe of Wisconsin. The election was 
called in accordance with an order issued on October 23, 1990, by the Deputy 
to the Assistant Secretary - Indian Affairs (Tribal Services) which permitted 
the qualified voters of the Menominee Tribe to vote on the adeption or 
rejection of a proposed revised constitution and bylaws.

As evidenced by the completed Certificate of Results of Election, the 
Constitution and Bylaws of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin was duly 
adopted by a vote of 181 for and 54 against in an election in which at least 
thirty percent (30%) of the 580 members registered and entitled to vote cast 
their ballots.

The Constitution and Bylaws of the Menominee Indian Tribe of Wisconsin is 
hereby approved pursuant to the authority granted to the Secretary of the 
Interior by the Act of June 18, 1934 (48 Stat. 984), as amended, and 
delegated to me by 230 D.M. 2.4. Please deliver the enclosed original 
document to the tribe.

Sincerely,

Director, Office of Tribal Services

Enclosure

